 We now have 4-month-old mice that are not diabetic,
 Dr Ehud Ur,
 Like other experts, he's sceptical about the possibility of curing diabetes, noting that these results are not applicable to people who are already suffering from type 1 diabetes.
 Monday, during a radio broadcast on Sveriges Radio, in Sweden, Sara Danius, the permanent Secretary of the Swedish Academy, announced publicly that the Academy, unable to reach Bob Dylan directly about the Nobel Prize in literature for 2016, had given up trying to contact him.
 Danius said,
 Auparavant, the Ceo of Ring, Jamie Siminoff, has made the point that he launched the company when the doorbell of his front door was not audible from his garage.
 He said he had designed a Wi-Fi doorbell.
 M. Siminoff a declared that the sales have increased after his appearance in 2013 in an episode of Shark Tank where the panel of the series has refused to finance the start-up.
 At the end of 2017, Siminoff appeared on the television shopping channel, QVC.
 Also sued a security company,
 Even if an experimental vaccine seems, so far, to be able to reduce the rate of Ebola deaths, no cure has yet been sufficiently effective to treat the existing infection.
 Even if the administration of an antibody cocktail, ZMapp, had initially shown promising signs on the ground, formal studies have shown that its ability to limit deaths did not meet expectations.
 In the PALM trial,
 The American gymnastics Federation supports the letter from the United States Olympic Committee and accepts the absolute necessity of the Olympic family to promote a safe environment for all of our athletes.
 We agree with the USOC's statement that the interests of our athletes and clubs, as well as their sport, could be better served by going forward and making meaningful changes within our organization, rather than revoking accreditation.
 USA Gymnastics supports an independent investigation that could shed light on how the abuse of the proportion described so courageously by the survivors of Larry Nassar could go unnoticed for so long and adopts any necessary and appropriate changes.
 USA Gymnastics and the USOC have the same goal: to make gymnastics, as well as other sports, as safe as possible so that athletes can pursue their dreams in a safe, positive and accountable environment.
 Throughout the 1960s,
 During the 1976 selections, he advised Carter on foreign policy, then was an advisor to the National security advisor from 1977 to 1981, succeeding Henry Kissinger.
 During his time at the NSA, he helped Carter to resolve diplomatically international issues such as the Camp David accords, in 1978, the normalization of U.S. relations with China in the late 1970s, the Iranian revolution and its aftermath, such as the Iranian hostage crisis, in 1979, and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan, in 1979.
 The film, starring Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone, received nominations in all the major categories.
 Golsling and Stone have been nominated for the best actor and actress.
 Among the other nominations are those for best film, best director, best cinematography, best costumes, best editing, best original music, best production design, best sound editing, best sound mixing and best original screenplay.
 Two songs from the film, Audition and City of Stars, were nominated for best original song. The studio Lionsgate received 26 nominations, more than any other studio.
 Tard dimanche,
 The announcement came after Trump had a phone call with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdoğan.
 Turkey would also take in charge the guard of the captured ISIS fighters that, according to the statement, European nations have refused to repatriate.
 This confirms not only that at least some dinosaurs had feathers, a theory that's already widely accepted, but it provides details that fossils generally can't, like color and three-dimensional arrangement.
 The scientists say that the bird's plumage was Brownish-Red on the upper part,
 This discovery also allows us to better understand the evolution of feathers in birds.
 Given that dinosaur feathers did not have an entirely developed rachis,
 The structure of the feathers suggests they were not used for flight, but rather for regulation or temperature display.
 Scientists say that it is the tail of a juvenile dinosaur,
 A car bomb exploded at the headquarters of the police in Gaziantep, Turkey, this morning, killing two police officers and injuring more than twenty others.
 The governor's office said that nineteen of the injured were police officers.
 The police have said they suspect a suspected Daesh militant as the suspect behind this attack.
 They have found that the sun works according to the same basic principles as all the other stars.
 The luminosity and rotation are used together in order to determine the Rossby number of a Star, which is related to the flux of plasma.
 The more the number of Rossby is small,
 During his voyage, Iwasaki had problems at many occasions.
 He has been stolen by pirates, attacked by a rabid dog in Tibet, escaped a marriage in Nepal, and been arrested in India.
 The 802.11n standard works on both the 2.4 GHz and 5 GHz frequencies.
 This will allow for backward compatibility with 802.11a, b, and g, provided the station has two radios.
 The speeds of the Wi-Fi 802.11n standard are significantly faster than those of its predecessors, with a theoretical maximum bit rate of 600 Mbit/s.
 Duvall, who is married and has two grown children,
 When asked to comment, Miller stated,
 We will strive to reduce carbon dioxide emissions by a significant margin by 2020 compared to the 2005 level.
 He has not quantified these reductions, saying that they will be based on Chinese economic output.
 Hu a encouraged the developing world to avoid the old method of first polluting and then cleaning up.
 But he added,
 The Iraq study group presented its report today at 12 GMT.
 He warned that no action in Iraq at this stage will end sectarian war, the growing violence or the slide towards chaos.
 The report opens with a call for an open debate and a consensus in the United States on the policy towards the Middle East.
 The report is very critical of almost every aspect of the current government's policy towards Iraq, and strongly argues for a change of direction.
 The first of its 78 recommendations is that a new diplomatic initiative should be taken before the end of the year to secure Iraq's borders against hostile interventions and to re-establish diplomatic relations with its neighbours.
 The current Argentine Senator and First Lady, Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner, announced her candidacy for President last night in La Plata, a city located 50 kilometers from Buenos Aires.
 Ms Kirchner announced her intention to run for the Presidency at the Argentine theatre, the same place where she began her campaign in 2005 for the Senate as a member of the Buenos Aires delegation.
 The debate was triggered by the controversy over the spending and reconstruction following Hurricane Katrina, which some budget conservatives have humorously called the Bush New Orleans agreement.
 The critics of the liberals,
 More than four million people.
 Because of the large number of people present, it was not possible for everyone to attend the funeral on St . Peter's square.
 Several large television screens were set up at different locations in Rome to allow people to watch the ceremony.
 In many other Italian cities and in the rest of the world, in particular in Poland, similar installations have been realized and have been seen by a great number of people.
 Historians have criticized the FBI's past policies for concentrating resources on easy cases, in particular car theft cases, with the intention of increasing the agency's success rate.
 The Congress launched the funding of the initiative against pornography during the course of the year 2005, while specifying that the FBI was about to assign ten agents to the fight against adult pornography.
 Robin Uthappa a scored the highest score of the innings, 70 runs in just 41 balls, hitting 11 four and 2 six.
 The middle order batters, Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid, have got good results and have scored a century together.
 But after losing the captain's guichet, the Inde only made 36 courses and lost seven guichets until the end of the race.
 The American President, George W . Bush,
 He was welcomed by Wong Kan Seng, the deputy Prime Minister of Singapore, and discussed trade and terrorism with Lee Hsien Loong, the Prime Minister of Singapore.
 After seven days of mid-term election defeats, Bush announced his plan to expand trade in Asia.
 The Prime Minister, Stephen Harper, has agreed to send the government's Clean Air Act to a multi-party committee for review, before its second reading, after a 25-minute meeting Tuesday with the NDP leader, Jack Layton, at the PMO.
 Layton had asked for changes to the Conservatives' environmental bill during the meeting with the Prime Minister, asking for a complete and thorough rewriting of the Conservatives' environmental bill.
 And since then, the Federal Government has taken the lead in funding the Mersey hospital in Devonport, Tasmania.
 But the Prime Minister, John Howard,
 According to the latest bulletin,
 No major damage or injury has been reported in Tonga, but electricity was temporarily cut off, which would have prevented the Tongan authorities from receiving the tsunami warning issued by the Pacific Tsunami Warning Centre.
 Fourteen schools in Hawaii,
 The American President, George W . Bush,
 The spokesman for Bush, Gordon Johndroe,
 Jerry, the tenth hurricane of the season,
 At this stage, Jerry poses no threat to land.
 According to the U S . Corps of Engineers, a rainfall of 6 inches could open a breach in the previously damaged levees.
 The ninth ward, which saw 20 feet of flooding during Hurricane Katrina, is currently underwater.
 The water pours over the dike in a section of 100 feet wide.
 During his talk on Wikinews last month, Commons director Adam Cuerden expressed his frustration at the deletions that had been made.
 And then he just like,
 The discontent of the community has led to the current efforts to devise a policy regarding the sexually oriented content of the site that hosts millions of freely accessible media.
 The work was mainly theoretical, but the program was written to simulate the observations made of the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 The effect that the team was looking for would be caused by tidal forces between the dark matter of the Galaxy and the dark matter of the Milky way.
 As the moon exercises a pull on the earth, causing tides,
 Scientists have been able to conclude that dark matter affects other dark matter in the same way that normal matter affects normal matter.
 According to this theory,
 The television reports show white smoke coming from the plant.
 The local authorities are warning the residents of the surrounding areas to stay indoors, to turn off the air conditioners and not to drink the water from the tap.
 According to the Japanese nuclear agency,
 The authorities assume that this means that the uranium fuel tanks on the site would have cracks and leaks.
 Dr Tony Moll discovered Multi-Resistant TB in the South African region of KwaZulu-Natal.
 In an interview, he said,
 Some patients would have contracted the virus at the hospital, according to Dr . Moll, and at least two of them were part of the hospital staff.
 Over a one year period,
 However, the percentage of TB-UR in the total group of people with tuberculosis still seems low, 6,000 people out of a total of 330,000 have been infected at some point in South Africa.
 The satellites, which weighed both more than 450 kg and were moving at about 28,000 km per hour, collided at an altitude of 790 km.
 The scientists say the explosion caused by the collision was massive.
 We're still trying to figure out what the extent of the damage is,
 The strategic command of the United States Department of defense follows the debris.
 The result of the tracing will be published on a public Website.
 A doctor working at the children's hospital of Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, has been charged with murder after his mother was found dead in the trunk of his car on Wednesday, according to Ohio authorities.
 The doctor, Malar Balasubramanian,
 She directed the officers to her black Oldsmobile Intrigue,
 Here, they found the body of Saroja Balasubramanian, 53, covered in blood-soaked blankets.
 The police said it looked like the body had been there for a day.
 First cases of this seasonal illness were reported at the end of July.
 Pigs are carriers of the disease, which is then transmitted to humans by mosquitoes.
 The epidemic has incited the Indian government to take such measures as the deployment of pig catchers in the severely affected areas, the distribution of thousands of mosquito nets and the spraying of pesticides.
 Several million vaccine doses have also been promised by the government, which will help to prepare health agencies for next year.
 The plans for delivering vaccines to the historically hardest-hit areas this year have been delayed because of a lack of funds and the low priority given to these diseases compared to others.
 In 1956, Słania settled in Sweden, where three years later, he began working for the Swedish postal service.
 He has produced more than 1000 stamps for Sweden and 28 other countries.
 His work is of such quality and of such a high level of detail that he is one of the few well-known philatelists of the general public.
 His one thousandth stamp was the beautiful,
 Amongst the recent examples of his work,
 Succumbing to his injuries,
 The truck driver, a 64-year-old man, was not injured in the accident.
 The vehicle itself was removed from the scene of the accident at around 12:00 GMT the same day.
 A garage employee near the scene of the accident said,
 They are all returned to the place where the accident happened.
 Among the other items on the agenda in Bali are the safeguarding of the world's last forests and the sharing of technologies to help developing countries grow in a less polluting way.
 The UN hopes to finalise a fund to help countries hit by the effects of global warming.
 Money could be reversed into building flood resistant houses, into better water management, and into diversifying crops.
 Fluke a wrote that the efforts of some to prevent women from talking about their health have failed.
 She came to this conclusion thanks to the multiple positive comments and encouragements she received from both women and men on the importance of considering contraception as a necessity.
 Once the fight was over,
 The negotiators have tried to rectify the situation, but the demands of the prisoners are unclear.
 Between 22 h 00 and 23 h 00 MDT, the inmates lit a fire in the courtyard.
 Soon, officers equipped with anti-riot gear,
 The firefighters finally put out the fire at 11:35 p.m.
 After the construction of the dam in 1963, seasonal flooding that used to spread sediment into the river has been stopped.
 This sediment was necessary to the creation of sand banks and beaches, which served as habitats for fauna.
 And two others are in danger of disappearing,
 Well, although the water level only rose a few metres after the flood,
 No tsunami alert was issued, and according to the Jakarta geophysics agency, no tsunami alert will be issued because the earthquake did not reach the required magnitude of 6.5.
 Despite the absence of a tsunami, residents panicked and left their homes and businesses.
 Despite the tears shed during her farewell, Oprah Winfrey has clearly said to her fans that she will be back.
 «It's not a good-bye.
 The final results of the Namibian Presidential and Parliamentary elections indicate that the incumbent President, Hifikepunye Pohamba, has been re-elected by a large majority.
 The ruling party, the South West African People's Organisation, SWAPO, has also retained its majority in the National Assembly.
 The coalition and Afghan troops have moved into the area to secure the site, and a coalition aircraft has been sent to support.
 The accident took place in mountainous terrain, and it would seem that it was caused by a malicious fire.
 The search for the crash site is hampered by inclement weather and the rough terrain.
 According to the NGO,
 The spokesman for Doctors Without Borders, Richard Veerman, said,
 The matches began at 10 a M. with a beautiful day, and apart from the drizzle of the middle of the morning, which soon cleared, it was a perfect day for Rugby Sevens.
 South Africa, at the head of the class, started off on a good note by beating Zambia, the fifth-ranked team, 26 to 0.
 South Africa, which seemed decidedly rusty in its match against its Southern consorts,
 Their defense was well disciplined,
 The officials of the city of Amsterdam and the Anne Frank museum claim that the tree is infected with a fungus and that it constitutes a danger to public health, because they argue that there is an immediate danger of falling.
 He was due to be executed on Tuesday, but he was saved following an urgent court decision.
 All the entrances to the caves, which have been baptized as the seven sisters, have a diameter of at least 100 to 250 meters.
 The Infra-Red pictures reveal,
 They're fresher than the surrounding surface during the day,
 But they are similar in that they are deep holes in the ground.
 In France, voting is traditionally a low-tech affair.
 After the agents have verified his identity,
 The French electoral code regulates the operations quite strictly.
 Since 1988, the urns must be transparent so that the voters and observers can ascertain that no envelope is present at the beginning of the vote and that no envelope is added, except those of the duly counted and authorized voters.
 Candidates may send representatives to attend each step of the process.
 The Asus Eee PC, previously launched globally for reasons of economy and functionality, became a hot topic at the Taipei IT Month of 2007.
 But the market for notebooks will be profoundly disrupted and diversified after ASUS was awarded the Taiwan Sustainable Award 2007 given by the Executive Yuan of the Republic of China.
 The Website of the station describes the show as a, quote,
 Initially, the show was only broadcast on the venerable Internet radio site Toginet radio,
 In the year two thousand and fifteen, TogiNet created AstroNet Radio as a subsidiary station.
 At the beginning, the show featured amateur voice actors from East Texas.
 The looting would have continued throughout the night,
 An observer has described Bichkek as being in the process of sinking into anarchy, while the population was moving in bands through the streets and looting the shops.
 Several residents of Bichkek have blamed the protesters in the South for the anarchy.
 South Africa beat the All Blacks.
 The match ended at a point, 21 to 20, ending the All Blacks' 15-game winning streak.
 For the Springboks, it was the end of a five-match losing streak.
 It was the last match of the All Blacks,
 The last match of the championship will take place at Ellis Park in Johannesburg next week, when the Springboks will play against Australia.
 A moderate earthquake shook the West of Montana Monday at 22:08.
 The United States Geological Survey and its National earthquake information center have not received immediate reports of damage.
 The epicenter of the earthquake was about 20 kilometers,
 The outbreak of the deadly avian influenza, H5N1, has been confirmed as having infected a dead wild duck found Monday in a marsh near Lyon in eastern France.
 France is the seventh EU country to be hit by the virus, following Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy.
 The suspected cases in Croatia and Denmark have not yet been confirmed.
 Chambers had sued God for genocide,
 Chambers, an Angel, affirms that his prosecution is frivolous and that anyone can prosecute anyone.
 The story presented in the French opera, by Camille Saint-Saens, is that of an artist,
 And as a result,
 Newt Gingrich, the former Speaker of the House, Rick Perry, the governor of Texas, and Michele Bachmann, a congresswoman from Minnesota,
 After the publication of the results, Newt Gingrich congratulated Rick Santorum, but had harsh words for Mitt Romney, on whose behalf negative publicity campaigns had been aired in Iowa against Newt Gingrich.
 He said, quote,
 Bachmann, who had won the straw vote in August, decided to end his campaign.
 The photographer was transported to the Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center, where he died from his injuries.
 In a statement, Bieber said,
 The photographer allegedly stopped his vehicle on the other side of Sepulveda Boulevard and attempted to take pictures of the police stop before he crossed the road and continued, allegedly inciting the California Highway Patrol officer to order him to turn around, twice.
 According to police,
 With only eighteen medals available per day, a number of countries have failed to make it onto the podium.
 They include the Netherlands, with Anna Jochemsen who finished ninth in the women's Super-G yesterday, and Finland, with Katja Saarinen who finished tenth in the same event.
 The Australian Mitchell Gourley finished 11th in the men's Super-G.
 The Mexican Arly Velasquez finished fifteenth in the men's Super-G.
 The Polish blind skier Maciej Krezel and his guide Anna Ogarzynska finished in thirteenth place in the Super-G.
 The UN peacekeepers who arrived in Haiti after the 2010 earthquake are accused of spreading the disease that began near the troops' camp.
 According to the trial, the UN camp's waste was not properly disposed of, causing bacteria to enter the Artibonite River, one of Haiti's largest rivers.
 Before the arrival of the troops,
 The Haitian Institute for justice and democracy has made reference to independent studies which suggest that the Nepalese UN peacekeeping battalion involuntarily brought the disease to Haiti.
 Danielle Lantagne, an expert on the disease, said the outbreak was probably caused by the peacekeepers.
 Hamilton confirmed that the Howard University hospital had admitted the patient in a stable condition.
 The patient had gone to Nigeria,
 The hospital has respected the protocol for infection prevention, including isolating the patient to avoid any possible infection of other patients.
 Before the Simpsons, Simon had worked on several series,
 During the 1980s, he worked on such shows as Taxi, Cheers, and The Tracy Ullman show.
 In 1989, he participated in the creation of the Simpsons with Brooks and Groening and was responsible for the hiring of the first team of writers of the series.
 Despite his departure from the show in 1993, he retained the title of executive producer and continued to receive tens of millions of dollars each season in royalties.
 The Chinese news agency Xinhua announced the hijacking of a plane.
 Subsequent reports have revealed that the aircraft had been the subject of a bomb threat and had been redirected to Kandahar.
 The first reports indicate that the plane was diverted to Afghanistan after being refused an emergency landing in Urumqi.
 The accidents are frequent in Iran, which has an old and poorly maintained fleet,
 Because of the international sanctions, it is not possible to buy new planes.
 At the beginning of this week, a police helicopter crashed, killing three people and injuring three others.
 Last month, Iran experienced its worst air disaster in years when a plane heading to Armenia crashed, killing the 168 people on board.
 The same month, another airliner made a runway excursion at Mashhad and hit a wall, killing seventeen people.
 The Aerosmith group has canceled the last concerts of its tour.
 The band was supposed to tour the United States and Canada until September 16.
 They canceled the tour after Steven Tyler fell off the stage during a concert on August 5.
 Murray a perdu le premier set au tie break after the two men had kept their service throughout the set.
 Despite the net advantage of Del Potro during the second set, it was necessary to go through a tie-break once the score reached 6-6.
 Potro a reçu at this moment des soins pour son épaule, but a réussi to reprendre the match.
 The program started at 20:30, local time.
 And famous singers have sung bhajans, or devotional songs, at the feet of Shri Shyam.
 The singer Sanju Sharma began the evening, followed by Jai Shankar Choudhary. Lakkha Singh also presented the Chhappan Bhog bhajan, accompanied by Raju Khandelwal.
 Then Lakkha Singh took the initiative of singing the bhajans.
 108 assiettes of Chhappan Bhog have been served to Baba Shyam.
 And as for Lakkha Singh,
 Thursday, during the Tokyo Game Show's main presentation, Nintendo's President, Satoru Iwata, revealed the design of the company's new Nintendo Revolution Console.
 Identical to a television remote control, the control uses two sensors placed near the user's television to triangulate its position in three-dimensional space.
 This will allow players to control actions and movements in video games by moving the device in the air.
 Giancarlo Fisichella a perdu le contrôle de sa voiture and ended the race shortly after the start.
 His teammate, Fernando Alonso, dominated the race, but a stop at the pit stop ended that domination, no doubt because of a loose right front wheel.
 Michael Schumacher a terminé sa course peu de temps après Alonso, en raison des dommages subis au niveau des suspensions tout au long de la course.
 And she's very pretty, and she sings very well.
 And I was like,
 Three minutes after the launch,
 However, they did not cause any damage to the shuttle.
 The head of NASA's shuttle program, N . Wayne Hale Jr, said the foam fell off after the time that we're concerned about.
 A minute later, the wind reaches 70 km per hour,
 And on my way, there were two people in wheelchairs,
 The NHK also made it known that the Kashiwazaki Kariwa nuclear power plant in Niigata Prefecture was operating normally.
 Hokuriku Electric Power Co. n'a signalé aucun effet du tremblement de terre and that reactors number 1 and 2 of its Shika nuclear power plant have been shut down.
 On signale qu'environ 9,400 habitations de la région are privées d'eau, and approximately 100 are without electricity.
 Some roads have been damaged, the railway service has been suspended in the affected areas, and the Noto airport in Ishikawa Prefecture is still closed.
 A bomb exploded in front of the governor's office.
 Three other bombs have exploded near government buildings in the space of two hours.
 Some reports say the number of dead is eight,
 Cyanuric acid and Melamine have been discovered in the urine samples taken from the pets that died after eating the contaminated pet food.
 The two compounds react with each other to form crystals that can block the kidney function,
 The investigators found that crystals had formed in the urine of cats because of the presence of these additional substances, melamine and cyanuric acid.
 The composition of these crystals corresponds to what is found in the urine of domestic animals affected when we compare by infrared spectroscopy.
 I don't know if you realize,
 Yet, 80% of our goods were taxed by customs duties in the countries of Central America.
 I was not sure what to do.
 All I say to the people,
 The governor of California, Arnold Schwarzenegger,
 The bill requires that violent Video games sold in the state of California be labeled with a sticker bearing the words,
 The director of public prosecutions, Kier Starmer QC, made a statement this morning announcing the prosecution of Huhne and Pryce.
 Huhne has resigned and will be replaced in the cabinet by the MP Ed Davey.
 Huhne and Pryce must appear before the Westminster Magistrates Court on the 16th of February.
 Alden and Cuddeback were both killed.
 Edgar Veguilla was injured in the arm and jaw, while Kristoffer Schneider had to undergo reconstructive surgery for his face.
 Schneider suffers from a lancinating pain,
 Schneider a testified via Video-Link from a U S . Air Force base in his home country.
 Aside from the Wednesday event, Carpanedo participated in two individual races during the championships.
 She first participated in the slalom, where she got a DNF in her first run. 36 of the 116 competitors got the same result in this run.
 Her other course, the giant slalom,
 In the category of women in skiing,
 The Madhya Pradesh police have recovered the stolen laptop and mobile phone.
 The assistant inspector general D.K. Arya said,
 The accused persons are Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanjar, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar, and Vishnu Kanjar.
 Chandra Shekhar Solanki,
 Although three people were in the house when the car hit it,
 However, the driver was severely injured in the head.
 The road where the accident took place was temporarily barred to allow the emergency services to extract the driver of the red Audi TT.
 He was first hospitalized at the James Paget hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was then transferred to Addenbrooke's hospital in Cambridge.
 Adekoya a has been found guilty of the murder of her son by the sheriff court in Edinburgh.
 She is in custody awaiting her trial,
 It's a common practice elsewhere in the UK, but Scottish justice works differently, and the courts have considered that publishing the photos could potentially be prejudicial.
 The reporters seem to be following a dangerous line if they publish photos, etc. of suspects.
 The office of the Prosecutor, which is in charge of all prosecutions, has told journalists that no other comment will be made until the indictment is filed.
 According to the leak, the document will focus on the dispute over the border that Palestine claims based on the borders that existed before the 1967 Middle East war.
 Among the other topics discussed were the future of Jerusalem, which is sacred to both nations, and the question of the Jordan Valley.
 Israel demands a permanent military presence in the valley for a period of ten years, while the Palestinian authority only consents to a period of five years.
 The extra parasite control rangers were to be closely supervised, because the trial was controlled and its efficacy evaluated.
 Within the framework of a partnership between NPWS and the Sporting Shooters Association of Australia, Inc, qualified volunteers have been recruited as part of the Sporting Shooters Association hunting program.
 According to Mick O'Flynn,
 Martelly a intronised yesterday a new provisional electoral Council (CEP) composed of nine members.
 It's the fifth PEC of Martelly in four years.
 Last month, a Presidential Commission recommended the dissolution of the previous CEP, as part of a package of measures to engage the country on the path to new elections.
 This Commission was Martelly's response to the vast protests against the regime that began in October.
 These protests, sometimes violent, have been triggered by the absence of elections, some of which were due to take place in 2011.
 Around 60 defective iPods have been reported, causing a total of six fires and leaving four people with minor burns.
 The Japanese Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry,
 The week before, METI announced that apple had informed them of 34 additional incidents, which apple had described as non-serious.
 The Ministry has reacted by qualifying the postponement of the report by apple as being, quote,
 The earthquake struck the Mariana Islands at 7:19 a M. local time.
 The Bureau of management of the emergency of the Northern Mariana Islands has declared that no damage has been reported in this country.
 Plus, the Pacific Tsunami warning center said there was no sign of a tsunami.
 An old Philippine policeman took hostage some tourists from Hong Kong by hijacking their bus in Manila, the capital of the Philippines.
 Rolando Mendoza shoots with his M16 on the tourists.
 Several hostages have been saved, and the death of at least six of them has been confirmed so far.
 Six hostages, including children and the elderly, were released prematurely, just like the Filipino photographers.
 The photographers then took the place of an elderly lady who needed to go to the toilet.
 Liggins a suivi les traces de son père et s'est lancé dans une carrière de médecin.
 He trained as an obstetrician,
 When he was working at the hospital,
 If a hormone was administered,
 The investigators reportedly found the recorders Wednesday.
 The other wrestlers also paid tribute to Luna.
 Tommy Dreamer a declared,
 Dustin Runnels,
 A poll taken before the Federal elections of 2010 revealed that the number of people opposed to Australia becoming a Republic had increased by 8% since 2008.
 The interim Prime Minister Julia Gillard stated during the 2010 Federal election campaign that she thought Australia should become a Republic at the end of the reign of Queen Elizabeth II.
 34% of those questioned share this view, and wish that Queen Elizabeth II be the last monarch to reign over Australia.
 At the other end of the scale,
 The Olympic gold medallist was due to compete in the 100 and 200 metres freestyle and three relays at the Commonwealth games, but his fitness was questioned.
 He couldn't take the medication he needed to get through the pain,
 Curtis Cooper, mathematician and computer science professor at the University of Central Missouri, discovered on January 25 the largest prime number known to date.
 Several people verified the discovery using different hardware and software at the beginning of February, and it was announced Tuesday.
 Comets may have been a source of water and organic matter for the earth.
 Scientists hope to understand how planets form,
 Cuomo, 53, began his term as governor earlier this year and signed a bill last month legalizing same-sex marriage.
 He called the rumors,
 He thinks he'll be running for President in 2016.
 NextGen is a system that would allow planes to fly shorter distances and save millions of gallons of fuel each year, limiting carbon emissions.
 It relies on satellite technology, and not on the ground radar systems used previously, which allows air traffic controllers to locate aircraft with greater precision and to provide pilots with more detailed information.
 The additional transport is inexistent and the surface trains will not stop at Wembley, and the parking and parks relais are not available on the ground.
 The fear of lack of transport has engendered the possibility that the match may be played behind closed doors, without the supporters of the teams.
 A study published Thursday in the journal Science has detailed the genesis of a new species of bird in the equatorial Galapagos Islands.
 Researchers from Princeton University in the United States and Uppsala University in Sweden have indicated that the new species evolved in only two generations, although this process was estimated to be much longer, following reproduction between a native Darwin's finch, Geospiza fortis, and the immigrant conical finch, Geospiza conirostris.
 One can shape gold in many ways.
 It can be drawn into a fine wire, which can be twisted and woven.
 It can be made very thin, and glued onto another metal.
 You can make a pH indicator using beet juice.
 The juice of the cabbage changes color according to the acidity or basicity of the chemical.
 The pH level is indicated by the amount of hydrogen ions present in the chemical being tested.
 The hydrogen ions are protons that have been stripped of their electrons.
 Then, with the hands propped on the knees,
 The moisture on your hands will react with the outer layers, which will cause a strange sensation and produce a kind of shell.
 The cities of Harappa and Mohenjo-daro had toilets equipped with a flush toilet in almost all the houses, connected to a sophisticated sewage system.
 The remains of sewerage systems have been found in the houses of the Minoan towns of Crete and Santorini in Greece.
 In the Roman civilization,
 When you call someone who's thousands of miles away,
 The satellite receives the call in space,
 The satellite was sent into space by a rocket. Scientists use telescopes in space because the earth's atmosphere distorts some of our light and our vision.
 It takes a giant rocket more than thirty meters high to put a satellite or a telescope into space.
 The most important of these is the wheel.
 It has brought us the train, the car, and many other means of transportation.
 Below these are smaller cats,
 There are also numerous small cats,
 The secret of their success is the concept of niche, a special task allotted to each feline, preventing it from entering into competition with the others.
 Cats are the most sociable of cats,
 The packs are composed of one to three adult males,
 Women are generally very close to one another,
 The troops of lions act like packs of wolves or dogs,
 The tiger can climb,
 The tiger is part of the same family as lions, leopards, and jaguars.
 But the roaring of the lion,
 Ocelots are fond of small animals. They catch monkeys, snakes, rodents, and birds if they can.
 According to scientists, ocelots track and find their prey by smelling their scent on the ground.
 They see very well in the dark, thanks to their nocturnal vision, and they move very stealthily.
 When a small group of living beings,
 This new environment has different resources and different competitors, so the new population will need new characteristics or adaptations in order to be a powerful competitor relative to what it was before.
 The population of origin has not changed at all,
 As the new population adapts to its new environment,
 And finally, after thousands or even millions of years,
 We call this process speciation, which means simply the formation of new species.
 Plants produce oxygen that humans breathe, and they absorb the carbon dioxide that humans exhale.
 Plants produce their food by using the sun's energy.
 We make our houses and our clothes from plants.
 The Mosasaur was the top predator of the time,
 His long, sharp teeth,
 We're not sure, but it's possible that he had a forked tongue.
 He also attacked anything that went into the water, even a giant dinosaur like a T. rex.
 Well, although the Romans ate some of the foods we know,
 And another difference,
 The Roman meals of antiquity could not include these foods of American or Asian origin which were introduced into Europe centuries later.
 For example, they had no maize,
 Each of the Babylonians built a temple for each of his gods,
 The people brought sacrifices to the gods,
 Each temple had an open court,
 Sometimes, pyramid-shaped towers, the ziggurats, were built as elements of a temple.
 The top of the tower was a special sanctuary for the God.
 In the hot climate of the Middle East,
 The major part of the Hebrew family life took place out of doors.
 The shops were open,
 As there were no great forests in the land of Canaan,
 In the Scandinavian Sagas,
 But independently of his discovery,
 Although each country is Scandinavian,
 If you've seen the movie National treasure,
 However, this is not true.
 On the back of the Declaration of independence, one could read the words,
 Well, at any rate,
 It is therefore probable that the notation a was added simply as a label.
 The landing of the day,
 She was ruled by the French of Vichy,
 On August 15, 1940, the Allies landed in the South of France, an invasion called operation Dragoon.
 In just two weeks, the Americans and the French liberated the South of France and were heading towards Germany.
 A civilization is a singular culture shared by a group of people who live and work in cooperation, a society.
 The word civilization is derived from the Latin word civis, which means citizen, and civitas, which means city or town.
 The city-states are the precursors of the nations. A civilizational culture implies the transmission of knowledge over several generations, a durable cultural imprint and a fair diffusion.
 Minority cultures often disappear without leaving any relevant historical traces, and are not recognized as true civilizations.
 During the Revolutionary war, the thirteen States first formed a weak central government,
 And as there was no executive or judicial power,
 He had not, either, the power to derogate from the laws of taxation,
 The articles required the unanimous consent of all the States before they could be amended, and the States took the central government so lightly that their representatives were often absent.
 The Italian national football team is, with the German national football team, the second most successful national team in the world.
 Among the popular sports are football, basketball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, rugby, cycling, ice hockey, roller hockey, and Formula One.
 The winter sports are the most popular in the northern regions, with Italians participating in international games and Olympic events.
 Japan has about 7,000 Islands,
 Because of the group of Islands that make it up,
 The first European to visit Taiwan was the Portuguese explorer Ferdinand Magellan,
 In 1624, the Dutch East India company established a base in the South-West of Taiwan, introducing a transformation of the indigenous cereal production practices and employing Chinese workers to work in its rice and sugar plantations.
 In 1683, the forces of the Qing dynasty (1644-1912) took control of the western and northern coastal areas of Taiwan and declared it a province of the Qing Empire in 1885.
 In 1895, after its defeat in the first Sino-Japanese war,
 Machu Picchu is composed of three main structures, namely the Intihuatana, the temple of the sun and the room of the three windows.
 Most of the buildings adjacent to the complex have been reconstructed in order to give tourists a better idea of their original appearance.
 In 1976, thirty percent of Machu Picchu had been restored, and this restoration continues to this day.
 The most common format,
 But what's important is that its image format is inherited from the Digital camera's image sensor format.
 The format 35 mm is actually, and this is quite deceptive,
 So we're going to divide by twelve.
 Many common formats, like the APS family, for example,
 The rule of thirds, often maltreated and often turned into ridicule, is a simple directive that generates dynamism while offering protection to the image.
 He indicates that the most effective place for the main subject is at the intersection of the lines dividing the image vertically and horizontally.
 During this period of European history, the Catholic Church, which had become rich and powerful,
 For more than a thousand years,
 His omnipresent power touched everyone, from the King to the roturier.
 One of the main Christian principles is that wealth should be used to relieve suffering and poverty, and that the church's monetary funds are there specifically for that reason.
 The central authority of the church has been in Rome for over 1000 years,
 Soon after the beginning of hostilities, Britain put in place a naval blockade against Germany.
 This strategy proved effective, cutting off vital military and civilian supplies, although this blockade violated generally accepted international law codified by several international agreements over the past two centuries.
 Britain mines international waters in order to prevent ships from venturing into entire maritime zones, thereby posing a threat even to neutral ships.
 As this tactic had only elicited a timid reaction,
 During the twenties, most citizens and nations showed a penchant for pacifism and isolation.
 After seeing the horrors and atrocities of the First World War, nations have wished to avoid such a situation in the future.
 In 1884, Tesla settled in the United States of America to take a job at the Edison company in New York.
 He arrived in the United States with four hundred dollars, a book of poetry, and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor,
 The ancient China had a unique way of showing the different eras,
 Between each dynasty, there was also an unstable age of divided provinces. The most well-known of these periods is the age of the Three Kingdoms, which lasted for 60 years between the Han dynasty and the Jin dynasty.
 During these periods, fierce struggles took place between many of the nobles who were fighting for the throne.
 The Three Kingdoms era was one of the most bloody periods in the history of Chinese antiquity.
 There are many social and political repercussions such as the use of the metric system, the shift from absolutism to republicanism, nationalism, and the belief that the country belongs to the people and not to a single leader.
 Also, after the revolution, the trades were opened to all male candidates, allowing the most ambitious and the most talented to succeed.
 And the same goes for the Army,
 The French Revolution also inspired many other oppressed working classes in other countries to begin their own revolutions.
 He used to go to a cave on the mountain of Hira,
 The cave itself, which has survived to the present day, gives a very vivid picture of Muhammad's spiritual inclinations.
 Situated at the top of one of the mountains to the North of Mecca,
 Even if you know it exists,
 On the other hand,
 The only one of the seven wonders that still exists today.
 Built by the Egyptians during the third millennium BC, the great pyramid is one of the many giant structures erected in honor of the pharaohs who had died.
 The plateau of Giza, or Giza Necropolis,
 The great pyramid was created to honor Pharaoh Khufu, and many smaller pyramids, tombs, and temples were built to honor his wives and other members of his family.
 The symbol push resembles a V,
 The top means you start with the tip and push the bow,
 A bow, generally speaking,
 N'hésitez pas to inscribe your own marks with a pencil, but remember that the printed marks are for a musical reason, and that you must therefore generally respect them.
 On the 6th of October, 1789, the King, Louis the sixteenth, the queen, Marie-Antoinette, their two young children, Marie-Therese, eleven years old, and Louis-Charles, four years old, and the King's sister, Madame Elizabeth,
 In a coach, they returned to Paris, surrounded by a crowd of people who shouted and cried out threats against the King and the queen.
 The King and the queen were obliged,
 At a given moment, a member of the crowd brandished the head of a Royal guard killed at Versailles before the terrified queen.
 The expenses of the war of American imperialism in conquering the Philippines have been paid by the Filipino people themselves.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the American colonial regime to cover a large part of the expenses and interest on the bonds issued in the name of the Philippine government by the Wall Street banks.
 Naturally, the super profits resulting from the prolonged exploitation of the Philippine people could constitute the fundamental advantages of American imperialism.
 To understand the Templars,
 These events took place in the period generally considered as the High Middle Ages,
 The central Middle Ages were preceded by the early Middle Ages and followed by the late Middle Ages, which by convention ends around 1500.
 The technological determinism is a term that encompasses a wide range of ideas in practice, ranging from the technological push or the technological imperative to a strict sense in which the destiny of humanity is dictated by an underlying logic linked to the laws of science and their manifestation in technologies.
 The two ideas are as follows.
 For example, one could say that the automobile leads necessarily to the development of roads.
 However, a national road network is not economically viable for a handful of cars, which is why new production methods are being developed to reduce the cost of car ownership.
 The massive possession of cars also leads to a greater incidence of accidents on the roads, which leads to the invention of new techniques in the field of health care to treat the bodily injuries.
 The romanticism presented an important element of cultural determinism, drawn from writers such as Goethe, Fichte, and Schlegel.
 According to the theories of Romanticism, geography would have moulded the individuals, and with time, customs and a culture linked to this geography would have emerged,
 In the same way that Paris is known as the capital of the world of fashion,
 Its reputation as the epicentre of luxury began around the year 400, and lasted until about 1100.
 The Byzantine Empire,
 It was at this time that the title of capital of fashion was transferred from Constantinople to Paris.
 The Gothic style peaked between the tenth and fourteenth centuries.
 At the beginning, the robe was strongly influenced by the Byzantine culture,
 However, due to the slowness of communication, Western modes could be 25 to 30 years behind.
 During the late Middle Ages, Western Europe began to develop its own style. One of the greatest advances of the time, following the Crusades, was the use of buttons for fastening clothing.
 Agriculture for subsistence is agriculture practiced to produce enough food to meet the needs of the farmer and his family.
 Agriculture of subsistence is a simple system, often biological, using seed saved from the original ecoregion, combined with crop rotation or other relatively simple techniques to maximize yield.
 Historically, most farmers practiced subsistence farming,
 Subcultures bring together individuals who feel neglected by societal norms and who share the same ideas, which allows them to develop a sense of identity.
 Subcultures may be distinguished by age, ethnicity, class, location, and or gender.
 The criteria which determine a subculture as distinct may be linguistic, aesthetic, religious, political, sexual, geographic, or a combination of factors.
 Members of a subculture often signal their membership by a distinctive and symbolic use of style, which encompasses fashions, manners, and slang.
 One of the most common ways of illustrating the importance of socialization is to draw on the few unfortunate cases of children who, through neglect, misfortune, or wilful abuse, have not been socialized by adults during their childhood.
 Some of these children were imprisoned by their own parents,
 Wild children may have suffered severe abuse or trauma before being abandoned or running away.
 Some would have been raised by animals.
 When they are fully raised by Non-Human species,
 While project-based pedagogy should make learning easier and more interesting, support goes further.
 Support is not a method of learning, but rather a way of helping learners who are discovering a new teaching such as the use of a new program or the beginning of a new project.
 Supports can be both virtual and real.
 Virtual scaffolding is integrated into the software and is designed to question, guide, and explain procedures that might otherwise have been too difficult for the student to manage on his or her own.
 The children are placed in foster care for a variety of reasons,
 No child should ever have to grow up in an environment that is not stimulating, attentive, and educational, but that is the case.
 We see the system of family placement as a zone of safety for these children.
 Our system of foster care is supposed to provide safe, loving, stable homes and reliable health care.
 The placement in a foster home is supposed to provide all the necessities that were lacking in the home from which they were removed.
 Internet allie des éléments de communication de masse and communication interpersonnelle.
 The distinctive characteristics of the Internet lead to additional dimensions in terms of approach to uses and gratifications.
 For example, learning and socialization are considered to be major factors in the use of the Internet.
 The personal and the ongoing have also been identified as new motivational aspects by Eighmey and McCord (1998) when they studied the public's reactions to Websites.
 The use of Video-Recording has led to great discoveries in the interpretation of Micro-Expressions,
 On pretends, in particular, that one can detect if a person is lying by correctly interpreting micro-expressions.
 Oliver Sacks, in his article,
 He even suggests that such capacities for interpreting human behaviour may be found in animals such as domestic dogs.
 The twentieth century researches have shown that there are two reservoirs of genetic variation,
 The Mutation adds a new genetic variation,
 Segregation and recombina tion alternate the variations between the two basins at each generation.
 In the savanna, it is difficult for a primate with a digestive system similar to that of humans to satisfy its needs in amino acids from the available plant resources.
 And in addition, an absence of reaction has grave consequences,
 The most easily accessible vegetable proteins are the proteins contained in leaves and legumes, but these are difficult to digest for primates like us, unless they are cooked.
 By contrast, the food of animal origin,
 We shouldn't be surprised if our own ancestors solved their protein problem in much the same way that chimpanzees do today.
 The interruption of sleep is the process that consists of waking intentionally during your period of sleep and falling asleep again shortly afterward.
 This can be done easily by using a relatively quiet alarm clock,
 If you find yourself resetting the clock during your sleep, it can be placed on the other side of the room, forcing you to get out of bed to turn it off.
 The other possibilities based on the biorythms include drinking a lot of liquids before going to bed,
 The degree of inner peace of a person is opposed to the degree of tension in his body and mind.
 The more tension is weak,
 Everybody can attain enlightenment.
 Buddhism is based on the teachings of Buddha,
 In principle, Tibetan Buddhism is very simple.
 With Kundalini Yoga, the Kundalini energy is awakened through yoga postures, breathing exercises, Mantras, and visualizations.
 The center of Tibetan meditation is the yoga of deity.
 The United States and the Soviet Union,
 Two years after the end of the war, the former allies became enemies, and the cold war began.
 It would last for the next 40 years,
 On the seventeenth of September,
 But these plans became obsolete almost from day to day,
 The use of ships for the transport of goods is by far the most efficient way to move large quantities of people and goods across the oceans.
 The work of the Navy has traditionally been to ensure that your country maintains the ability to move your people and your goods, while interfering with your enemy's ability to move his people and his goods.
 One of the most remarkable examples of this situation was the North Atlantic campaign during World War II.
 At the same time, the German Navy,
 If the Allies had failed,
 It seems that goats were first domesticated around 10,000 years ago in the Zagros mountains of Iran.
 The cultures and ancient tribes began to keep them close by for easy access to milk, hair, meat, and skin.
 The domestic goats were generally kept in herds that wandered over the hills or other grazing areas, often tended by shepherds who were mostly children or adolescents, similar to the more familiar term shepherd.
 The wagonways were built in England as early as the sixteenth century.
 Although the ways for wagons were simply made of parallel wooden planks, they allowed the horses that pulled them to reach greater speeds and to pull heavier loads than on the slightly more accidental roads of the day.
 However, it was soon realized that the tracks would be more effective if they were equipped with a metal strip on the top.
 This has become a common practice, but the iron has caused more wear on the wooden wheels of the wagons.
 Finally, the wooden wheels were replaced by iron wheels. In 1767, the first iron rails made their appearance.
 The first way of locomotion was walking,
 Their predecessors, the Australopithecines,
 On finds bipedal specialisations in the fossils of Australopithecus from 4.2 to 3.9 million years ago, although Sahelanthropus may have been bipedal as early as seven million years ago.
 We can start by living in better harmony with the environment, we can join the environmental movement, and we can even campaign to mitigate the suffering that is to come.
 However, if we want a permanent solution,
 It is clear that the world has changed a lot thanks to the scientific and technological advances made by human beings, and that the problems have become more important due to the overpopulation and the extravagant lifestyle of humanity.
 After its adoption by the Congress on July 4,
 Between 150 and 200 copies were made, today known as the Dunlap Broadsides.
 The first public reading of the document was made by John Nixon in the court of the Independence hall on the 8th of July.
 The other was sent to George Washington,
 The 25 Dunlap sheets are the earliest copies of the document.
 Many paleontologists think today that a group of dinosaurs survived and are still alive.
 Few people consider them as dinosaurs,
 But there are a lot of things about birds that still resemble dinosaurs.
 They have feet covered with scales and armed with claws, they lay eggs and walk on their hind legs like T-Rex.
 Pratiquement all the computers used today are based on the manipulation of information that is coded in Binary.
 A Binary number can only have one of two values,
 A poisoning may not be visible immediately. The symptoms, such as vomiting, are sufficiently general that an immediate diagnosis cannot be made.
 The best indicator of internal poisoning is probably the presence of an open container of medicines or toxic household products.
 Consult the label for specific first aid instructions.
 The term insect is used by entomologists in a formal sense for this group of insects.
 This term derives from an ancient familiarity with bed bugs, which are insects that are very well adapted to parasitize humans.
 Reduced to its simplest form,
 In the United States, there are about 400,000 cases of multiple sclerosis, making it the leading neurological disease in young and middle-aged adults.
 It is a disease of the central nervous system,
 Research has shown that women are two times more likely to have multiple sclerosis than men.
 A couple may well consider that it is not in their interest,
 These couples can choose to make an adoption plan for their baby.
 Within the context of adoption,
 The main goal of science is to understand how the world works,
 And it's not the only one,
 Naturalists and philosophers have focused on the ancient texts,
 The opinions of Aristotle on all scientific questions, including psychology, have been accepted.
 With the decline of knowledge of Greek,
 Many rhythms observed in physiology and behavior often depend in large part on the presence of endogenous cycles and their production by biological clocks.
 The periodic rhythms, which do not simply constitute responses to periodic external stimuli, have been documented for most living things, including bacteria, fungi, plants, and animals.
 Biological clocks are self-sustaining oscillators that will continue a cycle of functioning for a certain period even in the absence of external stimulation.
 The Hershey and Chase experiment was one of the main indications that DNA was a genetic material.
 Hershey and Chase used phages, or viruses, to implant their own DNA into a bacterium.
 They did two experiments to mark either the phage DNA with a radioactive phosphorus,
 Mutations can have many different effects depending on the type of mutation, the size of the part of the genetic material that is affected, and whether the affected cells are germ cells.
 Only the changes in the germ cells can be transmitted to the children, while other changes can lead to the death of the cells or cancer.
 Ecotourism is the interest in visiting natural areas,
 Hunting, fishing, photography, bird watching, visiting parks, and studying information about the ecosystem are examples of on-site activities.
 One can, for example, go and see, photograph, and discover the orangutans of Borneo.
 Every morning, people leave the small towns in cars to go to their place of work, and they meet other people who are going to work in the countryside they have just left.
 In this dynamic transportation system,
 The science now shows that this economy,
 Everybody is part of the society and uses the transportation systems.
 In developed countries, it is rare to hear so many complaints about the quality of water or the collapse of bridges.
 Why do transport systems break down,
 The flow of traffic is the study of the movements of drivers and vehicles between two points, and the interactions they have with each other.
 Unfortunately, it is difficult to study the flow of traffic because the behavior of drivers cannot be predicted with one hundred percent certainty.
 Fortunately, drivers tend to act within a reasonably coherent range, so traffic flows tend to have a reasonable coherence and can be represented mathematically in an approximate way.
 To better represent the flow of traffic, relationships have been established between the three main characteristics: (1) the throughput,
 These relationships assist in the planning, design, and operation of roadway facilities.
 The insects were the first animals to fly.
 Most insects have the advantage of being able to fold their wings along their bodies.
 It gives them a greater number of places to hide.
 Today, the only insects that cannot fold their wings are the Dragonflies and the Mayflies.
 A few thousand years ago, a man named Aristarchus claimed that the solar system was moving around the sun.
 But many believed the opposite,
 But it does.
 The Amazon River is the second longest and the largest river on earth.
 The Amazon is also the largest river in the world,
 Not less than 20% of the water that flows from the rivers of the planet into the oceans comes from the Amazon.
 The main branch of the Amazon is 6,387 kilometers long.
 Although the construction of pyramids in stone was pursued until the end of the Old Kingdom, the pyramids of Giza were never surpassed in size and the excellence of their construction.
 The Egyptians of the New Empire were amazed at the monuments of their predecessors, which were then more than a thousand years old.
 The Vatican is the smallest country in the world.
 The Vatican City state legislates and communicates in Italian.
 The Italian is also the everyday language used by most people who work in the state, while Latin is often used in religious ceremonies.
 The citizens of the Vatican city are all Catholics.
 Since Antiquity, peoples have been familiar with the basic chemical elements like gold, silver and copper, because they are found in nature in a raw state and are quite simple to mine using primitive tools.
 But the theory was that everything was made up of a mixture of one or more of these four elements.
 It was rather the four states of matter,
 The alloys are essentially a mixture of two metals or more.
 And so,
 There are also alloys which comprise a small quantity of non-metallic elements, such as carbon.
 All in the universe is made of matter.
 But they are not.
 So the pencil was a good friend to many people when it came out.
 Unfortunately, the appearance of new writing styles has relegated the pen to a more private and less common use.
 People write messages nowadays on computer screens, without ever having to approach a pencil.
 One can only wonder what the keyboard will become when the next novelty arrives.
 The fission bomb works on the following principle: it transforms energy by assembling a nucleus of a myriad of protons and neutrons.
 A little bit like if you were to climb a steep hill with a heavy cart.
 Some atoms have an unstable nucleus,
 The surface of the moon is made up of rocks and dust.
 The thickness of the crust is about 70 kilometers on the visible side and 100 kilometers on the hidden side.
 She is finer at the level of the seas and thicker under the continents.
 There may be more Maria on the near side because the crust is thinner.
 Theories of content are focused on the search for what makes people feel good or what they are attracted to.
 These theories suggest that people have certain needs and desires that are internalized as they mature into adulthood.
 These theories examine what drives certain people to want the things they do and what drives certain people to want to do or not do certain things.
 Two popular content theories are Maslow's hierarchy of needs and Herzberg's two-factor theory.
 Two behaviors can emerge.
 This type of manager has a hard time making unpopular decisions,
 At the other end of the spectrum,
 After all, the chief is responsible in the last resort for the success and failure of the team.
 This behavior often leads to dissension between the leaders and the rest of the team.
 Virtual teams are subject to the same standards of excellence as conventional teams, but there are subtle differences.
 Members of a virtual team often function as the point of contact for their physical group.
 They often have more autonomy than traditional team members because their teams can meet based on different time zones, which may not be understood by their local management.
 The presence of a real invisible team,
 The invisible team is the management team to which each member renders an account.
 Why would an organization want to impose the cumbersome process of creating a learning structure?
 When all the available resources are used effectively in the functional services of an organization, creativity and ingenuity can fully express themselves.
 The process of an organization working together to overcome an obstacle can lead to a new innovative process to meet the customer's need.
 Before an organization can be innovative, its leadership must create a culture of innovation, shared knowledge, and its own culture of learning.
 Angel (2006) presents the Continuum approach as a method used to help organisations achieve better outcomes.
 Neurobiological data provide material evidence for a theoretical approach to the study of cognition.
 The correlation between brain pathology and behavior supports scientists in their research.
 On the other hand,
 The rise of new technologies allows us to see and study brain structures and processes that we've never seen before.
 This gives us a lot of information and material to build simulation models that help us to understand the processes in our mind.
 Although artificial intelligence is often strongly connoted with science fiction, it represents a very important part of computer science, which studies the intelligent behavior, learning, and adaptation of a machine.
 The research in artificial intelligence aims at the automation of intelligent tasks.
 Among the examples are control, planning and programming, the ability to respond to diagnostics and customer questions, as well as recognition of writing, voice and face.
 These practices have led to distinct disciplines,
 The system of ai is now often used in the fields of economics, medicine, engineering, and the military, as it has been put into place in several home computer and Video-Game software.
 Well, the answer is,
 The solution is brought by technology in the form of virtual field trips.
 Participating in a field trip is also a great way to reflect on a trip and share your experiences with future generations.
 For example, students at Bennet high school in North Carolina create a Website every year about their visit to the state capital.
 Blogs can also help students improve their writing skills.
 As the students are often the most critical audience, the author of the Blog begins to strive to improve his writing to avoid criticism.
 And the fact that they're posting,
 Blogs are a tool that stimulates collaboration and encourages students to continue their learning well beyond the traditional school day.
 Um and when used in this way,
 Ottawa is the charming bilingual capital of Canada and has a great number of art galleries and museums that highlight the past and present of Canada.
 You'll find Niagara falls to the South,
 And all these measures, and many more,
 The great areas further North are sparsely populated,
 For a comparison of the population, which surprises more than one,
 The Islands of East Africa are situated in the Indian ocean, off the coast of East Africa.
 Madagascar is by far the largest country,
 Most of the smaller Islands are independent, or associated with France, and are known for being luxury resorts.
 The Arabs also brought Islam to the Comoros and Mayotte.
 European influence and colonialism began in the fifteenth century, at the time when the Portuguese explorer Vasco de Gama discovered the Cape route that linked Europe to India.
 North of the Sahel,
 To all women who travel,
 It is also advisable to wear a wedding ring.
 Women must realize that certain cultural differences can lead to behaviors that they consider to be harassment.
 So be firm in the refusal of men's advances, and don't be afraid to stand your ground.
 The modern city of Casablanca was founded by Berber fishermen in the tenth century BC, and was used by the Phoenicians, Romans, and Merinids as a strategic port called Anfa.
 The Portuguese, who after having destroyed it,
 The Moroccan Sultan rebuilt the city under the name of Daru l-Badya, and it was renamed Casablanca by the Spanish merchants who established trading posts there.
 Casablanca is one of the least interesting places in all of Morocco for shopping.
 Aux alentours de la vieille médina, on peut facilement trouver des endroits où acheter des produits marocains traditionnels, like des tajines, des poteries, des articles de maroquinerie, des narguilés and des bibelots of all sorts, but it's all for tourists.
 Goma is a tourist town situated in the extreme East of the Democratic Republic of Congo, near Rwanda.
 In 2002, Goma was destroyed by the lava of the Nyiragongo volcano, which buried most of the city's streets, in particular the downtown.
 Although Goma is reasonably safe, any visit outside of Goma must be the subject of research to understand the state of the fighting that persists in the province of North Kivu.
 The city is also the starting point for the ascent of the Nyiragongo volcano as well as for treks of mountain gorilla tracking, among the least expensive in Africa.
 You can use boda-boda's to get around Goma. The normal price is around 500 Congolese francs for a short ride.
 Combined with its relative inaccessibility,
 Today, Timbuktu is a poor city, although its reputation makes it a tourist attraction, and it has an airport.
 In 1990, it was added to the list of world heritage sites in danger,
 One of the main steps of the PBS show,
 The city contrasts strongly with the cities of the rest of the country,
 The Kruger National Park is located in northeastern South Africa and borders Mozambique to the east, Zimbabwe to the North, and the Crocodile River to the South.
 The total area of the park is 19,500 square kilometres, which is divided into 14 ecozones, each of which has its own specific fauna.
 It is one of the most famous parks in South Africa and is considered the flagship of South African National Parks.
 As for all South African national parks, there are daily entrance and conservation fees for the park.
 It may be advantageous to get a Wild Card that gives access to certain South African parks, as well as to all South African national parks.
 The Island of Hong Kong gives its name to the territory of Hong Kong,
 The row of buildings that outlines the horizon of Hong Kong has been compared to a scintillating bar graph that reflects in the waters of Victoria Harbour.
 To admire the most beautiful panoramas of Hong Kong,
 The great majority of urban development on Hong Kong Island is concentrated on the North shore.
 It's a place that the British colonists have invested in.
 The Sundarbans are the world's largest mangrove forest, extending 80 kilometers from the coast to the Bangladeshi and Indian hinterlands.
 The Sundarbans have been declared a UNESCO world heritage site.
 However, the forests are not composed only of mangrove swamps: they also contain some of the last vestiges of the majestic jungles that once covered the Ganges plain.
 The Sundarbans cover an area of 3,850 square kilometers, of which about one-third is covered by water.
 Sundarbans is a nature reserve since 1966, you can find there about 400 Royal Bengal tigers and 30,000 spotted deer.
 The buses leave from the inter-district bus station, which is on the other side of the river,
 The inter-district buses are often full, so it is advised to buy a ticket a few days in advance.
 Most of the districts are served by small Japanese cabotage steamers, which are comfortable and robust.
 The taxis collective are a quick and comfortable way to get to places nearby, such as Paro (150 Nu) and Punakha (200 Nu).
 The Oyapock bridge is a suspension bridge.
 The two towers are 83 meters high,
 The vertical clearance under the bridge is 15 meters. The structure was completed in August 2011, but it was not opened to traffic until March 2017.
 The bridge should be fully operational in September 2017,
 The Guaraní were the most important indigenous group living in what is now Eastern Paraguay, living as hunter-gatherers and also practising a subsistence agriculture.
 Other indigenous tribes who peopled the Chaco, such as the Guaycurú or the Payaguá, survived essentially thanks to fishing, hunting, or gathering.
 In the sixteenth century, Paraguay, once called the giant province of the Indies,
 The Spaniards inaugurated the period of colonization, which lasted three centuries.
 Since the foundation of Asuncion in 1537, Paraguay has managed to preserve a great part of its indigenous character and identity.
 Argentina is known for having one of the best teams and among the best players in the world.
 The largest tournament of the year takes place in December on the polo fields of Las Cañitas.
 And plus,
 For information on tournaments and where to buy tickets for polo matches,
 The official currency of the Falkland Islands is the Falkland Islands pound, which is equivalent to the British pound sterling.
 The only bank in the Islands is at Stanley, opposite the FIC West store.
 And so,
 Even though the credit cards may not be accepted,
 It is almost impossible to exchange money from the Falklands outside the Islands, so change it before you leave the Islands.
 The winter in the northern hemisphere corresponds to the summer in the Southern hemisphere.
 Montevideo is situated in a subtropical zone, and the summer temperatures exceeding 30°C are common.
 The winter can be deceptively cold.
 There are no real seasons of rain and drought.
 Although many of the park's animals are used to seeing humans,
 According to the park authorities,
 Also, as docile as they may appear, the bison, the moose, the elk, the bear, and almost all the great animals can attack.
 Every year, dozens of visitors are injured because they didn't keep a safe distance.
 In addition, know that odors attract bears and other wild animals, so avoid carrying or cooking odoriferous foods and keep the camp clean.
 The capital of Samoa is Apia.
 Apia was founded in the 1850s and is the official capital of Samoa since 1959.
 The port was the site of a naval impasse that became notorious in 1889, when seven ships from Germany, the United States, and Britain refused to leave the port.
 All but one British cruiser.
 The Supreme chief Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III was assassinated during a peaceful rally in the city, during the independence movement organised by the Mau.
 There are two main areas.
 The North Shore beaches are on the Pacific ocean and stretch from Long Bay in the North to Devonport in the South.
 Almost all the beaches are sandy and allow you to bathe in safety, and most of them are shaded by pohutukawa.
 The beaches of Tamaki Drive are on the Waitemata harbour, in the chic suburbs of Mission Bay and St Heliers in central Auckland.
 These beaches, sometimes very frequented by families, dispose of numerous shops along the coast.
 The main local beer is the Number One,
 There are many French wines to be tasted, but New Zealand and Australian wines travel better.
 You can drink the local tap water without danger, but you can easily find bottled water if you have any concerns about it.
 For Australians, the idea of a caf crme is foreign. A short black is an espresso, the cappuccino is filled with cream, and tea is served without milk.
 Hot chocolate is conforming to Belgian standards. The fruit juices are expensive but excellent.
 Many voyages on the Reef are made throughout the year, and injuries from one of these causes on the Reef are rare.
 However, follow the advice of the authorities, obey all the signs, and pay particular attention to the safety warnings.
 From October to April, near the beaches and estuaries of rivers,
 But sharks are not afraid of humans.
 The saltwater crocodiles don't live actively in the ocean, their habitat is mainly in the estuaries of the rivers north of Rockhampton.
 The advance reservation gives the traveler peace of mind,
 You can also book through travel agencies,
 The travel agencies generally offer packages that include breakfast, transportation to and from the airport, or even packages that combine the flight and the accommodation.
 They may also hold the reservation for you if you need time to think about the offer or to get other documents you may need for your destination, such as a visa.
 Now, all of a sudden,
 At certain music festivals,
 If you want to participate in the musical event,
 Even if the main music shows are over,
 Some festivals have special camping areas for families with young children.
 If you're crossing the North of the Baltic in winter, be sure to check the location of the hut, because the crossing of the ice can cause unbearable noises at the most exposed huts.
 Cruises to St Petersburg include time spent in the city. Cruise passengers are exempt from the visa requirement.
 The casinos generally make a lot of effort to maximize the time and money spent by customers. There are rarely windows and clocks, and the exits can be difficult to spot.
 They generally offer special deals on food, drinks, and entertainment in order to keep the guests happy and to keep them on the premises.
 On some sites, it's the locals who offer free alcoholic beverages. Nevertheless, intoxication impairs judgment, and all good players know that it's crucial to stay sober.
 Whoever travels by car to high latitudes or crosses mountain passes must consider the possibility of snow, ice or frosty temperatures.
 On the icy and snowy roads, friction is low and you cannot drive as if you were on the bare asphalt.
 During blizzards, it can snow enough in a very short time to bury you.
 The visibility may also be limited by snow or by the dust or by condensation or by the ice on the windows of vehicles.
 On the other hand, the presence of ice and snow is normal in many countries, and the traffic is practically uninterrupted all the year round.
 Safaris are perhaps the greatest tourist attraction in Africa and the most memorable moment for many visitors.
 In the common language, the term safari denotes a trip to Africa,
 Some animals, such as elephants and giraffes, tend to get close to cars and the standard equipment allows for good observation.
 Lions, Leopards, and cheetahs are sometimes shy,
 A safari on foot, also called a brousse,
 The Paralympics will be held from August 24 to September 5, 2021.
 Tokyo will be the only Asian city to have hosted two Olympic games, after hosting the 1964 games.
 If you have booked your flights and your accommodation in 2020 before the announcement of the postponement, you may be faced with a difficult situation.
 But as of late March,
 On average, event tickets cost between 2,500 and 130,000 yen, with the typical ticket costing around 7,000 yen.
 En repassant les vêtements humides,
 If you don't have an iron or you don't feel like wearing ironed socks,
 Avoid letting the fabric overheat.
 There are different ways of purifying water,
 In some localities, it suffices to boil the water for a minute,
 And if you have a concern,
 Travellers may encounter animals that they do not know in their home region.
 Parasites can contaminate food, cause irritation, or in the most serious cases, cause allergic reactions, spread venom, or transmit infections.
 Infectious diseases,
 In certain localities,
 Travellers to countries with high taxes can sometimes make considerable savings,
 The stretch between Point Marion and Fairmont presents the most difficult driving conditions on the Buffalo-Pittsburgh highway, frequently passing through isolated back country.
 If you're not used to driving on country roads, keep an open mind.
 The speed limits are significantly lower than in the previous and following sections, generally 35 to 40 mph.
 But on the other hand,
 And in Bavaria, they are very rich and varied,
 Pies and tarts are made of them all the year round,
 Many German bakery products also contain almonds, hazelnuts, and other nuts. Popular cakes often go especially well with a cup of strong coffee.
 If you want small but copious pastries, try the Berlin balls, also called Berliner, Pfannkuchen or Krapfen, depending on the region.
 A curry is a dish made of herbs and spices, accompanied by meat or vegetables.
 A curry dish may be either solid or liquid,
 In the interior regions of northern India and Pakistan, yogurt is commonly used in curries, while in the south of India and some other coastal regions of the subcontinent, coconut milk is commonly used.
 Indonesia, with its 17,000 Islands,
 However, when this term is used without other qualification, it tends to designate foods from the central and eastern parts of the main island of Java.
 Now, widely available throughout the archipelago, Javanese cuisine offers a range of dishes simply seasoned, the predominant flavors that the Javanese favor being peanuts, chili peppers, sugar, and various aromatic spices.
 The stirrups are supports for the rider's feet, which hang down on each side of the saddle.
 They offer greater stability to the user, but they can pose a security problem: in fact, the user's feet can get stuck in them.
 If a rider is projected from a horse, but a foot is caught in the stirrup, he could be dragged if the horse runs away.
 First, most riders wear riding boots with a heel and a fairly narrow sole.
 And then, certain saddles,
 Valley of Cochamó,
 From the heights, the panoramas on the mountains are impenetrable.
 The sports of downhill skiing and snowboarding are popular sports that consist of sliding down a snowy slope with skis or a snowboard attached to the feet.
 The ski is a major travel activity that counts many aficionados, sometimes called ski bums, who organize their entire vacations around skiing in specific locations.
 The idea of skiing is very old.
 The practice of alpine skiing as a sport dates back at least to the seventeenth century,
 Skiing,
 This resembles alpine skiing,
 Think of the ski route as a similar hiking route.
 You'll be able to cover a little bit more ground than you would on foot,
 Europe is a relatively small continent, but it comprises many independent countries. In classical circumstances, travelling through several countries therefore implies having to make several visa applications and undergo several passport checks.
 However, Schengen,
 So long as you remain within this zone,
 So having a Schengen visa,
 There is no universal definition of what constitutes an antique.
 The criteria vary according to the place where one is.
 Artisanal products can be considered as antiques, even if they are less old than similar industrial products.
 The reindeer herding is an important source of subsistence for the Sami, and the culture that surrounds this trade is of great importance for many other professions.
 Even if, according to tradition,
 In our days, many Sâmes practice modern trades.
 Although widely used, particularly among non-Roms, the term Gitan is often considered pejorative because of its association with negative stereotypes and a misrepresented image of the Roma.
 If the country you are travelling to has a travel warning issued by your government, your travel insurance may be affected.
 You can also have recourse to the advice of other governments, but their advice is tailored to their citizens.
 As an example,
 The opinions are only a brief summary of the political situation of a country.
 The opinions presented are often superficial, general, and too simplified compared to the more detailed information available elsewhere.
 The violent time is the generic term for any dangerous meteorological phenomenon susceptible of causing damage, of grave social upheaval, or the loss of human lives.
 Very unfavorable weather conditions can occur anywhere in the world, and they can be of several kinds, depending on geographic, topographic, and atmospheric characteristics.
 The violent winds, hail, excessive rainfall and fires are forms and effects of violent weather, just like thunderstorms, tornadoes, sea spray and cyclones.
 Extreme, regional, and seasonal weather phenomena include cold snaps, blizzards, and dust storms.
 It is strongly advised that travellers research the risks of bad weather that may affect their destination, knowing that this may have an impact on the itineraries that they are considering.
 Anyone who intends to go to a country that could be considered a war zone should receive professional training.
 A search on the Internet for,
 A course will normally cover all the topics discussed here in much more detail,
 A training session normally lasts from two to five days, and includes role-playing, a lot of first aid, and sometimes training in the use of weapons.
 Books and magazines dealing with survival in the wilderness are common, but publications dealing with war zones are few.
 Travellers who plan to have a sex change operation abroad should ensure that they have valid documents for their return journey.
 The willingness of governments to deliver passports whose gender is not indicated varies.
 The willingness of foreign governments to honor these documents is all too variable.
 The searches at security checkpoints have also become much more intrusive in the era after September 11, 2001.
 Transgender people in the pre-operative phase should not expect to pass scanners while protecting their privacy and dignity.
 The currents of Arrachement are currents which return from the waves which break on the beach, often on a shoal or equivalent.
 Because of the underwater topography,
 In most cases, the deaths are due to exhaustion,
 As soon as you get out of the current,
 It is also possible,
 The reintegration shock occurs sooner than the cultural shock,
 Travellers who have had a hard time adjusting to the new culture sometimes have a hard time adjusting back to their home culture.
 When you return home after living abroad, you've already adapted to the new culture and have lost some of the habits of your home culture.
 At first, when you went abroad,
 Perhaps people don't anticipate that patience and understanding are also necessary for travelers returning home.
 The spectacle, son and light at the pyramid, constitutes one of the most interesting attractions of the region for children.
 You can see the pyramids in the dark,
 But usually,
 The Sphinx is placed as the background and the narrator of a long story.
 The scenes are displayed on the pyramids,
 The Shetland Islands, discovered in 1819, are claimed by several nations and have the most number of research stations, sixteen of which are active in 2020.
 The archipelago is located 120 kilometers north of the peninsula.
 Other examples include Livingston and Deception Islands, where the caldera flooded by an active volcano offers a spectacular natural harbor.
 Ellsworth land is the southern region of the peninsula, bounded by the sea of Bellingshausen.
 The mountains of the peninsula merge into the plateau, then reappear to form the Ellsworth mountain range, which is 360 kilometers long and crossed by the Minnesota glacier.
 The northern part, or Sentinel range, contains the highest mountains in Antarctica, the Vinson massif, which reaches a height of 4,892 m.
 In remote areas,
 A satellite phone generally does not replace a cell phone,
 It's a service often used by shipping,
 Your local telephone operator should be able to tell you more about the connection to this service.
 And more and more of them are choosing that.
 This formulation is particularly appreciated by young people who are leaving school, because it allows them to take a year off before going to university, without compromising their studies.
 Often, the fact of having taken a year off to study abroad can actually give you a better chance of getting into graduate school.
 In general, you have to pay a fee to enroll in these educational programs.
 Finland is a destination of choice for boating. The country of a thousand lakes also has thousands of islands, both in the lakes and in the coastal archipelagos.
 You don't necessarily need a yacht in the archipelagoes and on the lakes.
 Although the coastal archipelagos and the largest lakes are actually quite large for a yacht, smaller boats or even a kayak offer a different experience.
 The navigation of pleasure is a national pastime in Finland,
 But in New Zealand,
 Most Baltic cruises feature a lengthy stay in St . Petersburg, Russia.
 You can visit the historic city for a few days,
 If you only go ashore with cruise ship excursions, you will not need a separate visa.
 The city of Berlin, in Germany,
 Voyaging by airplane can be a scary experience for people of all ages and backgrounds, especially if they've never flown before or have experienced a traumatic event.
 It's not different from the fears and the anxieties that a lot of people have about other things.
 For some, understanding something about how airplanes work and what happens during a flight can help overcome a fear that is based on the unknown or on not having control.
 Well, in the case of a repair,
 And on some routes,
 If they had sent goods by air freight,
 The only way to do that more quickly was to send it as registered baggage.
 The most obvious way to travel first or business class is to pay a lot of money for the privilege.
 However, this is not cheap: in general, you can expect to pay up to four times the normal economy fare, and eleven times for first class <Exclamationpoint>
 In general, it is useless to try to get reductions for seats in business or first class on direct flights from A to B.
 Airlines know very well that they can count on a certain type of traveler who is willing to pay a lot of money for the privileges of speed and comfort, and they set their fares accordingly.
 The capital of Moldova is Chisinau.
 Moldova is a Multi-Ethnic Republic that suffers from ethnic conflicts.
 In 1994, this conflict led to the creation of the Transnistrian Republic in Eastern Moldova, with its own government and currency, but recognized by no United Nations member state.
 Economic ties have been reestablished between these two parts of Moldova, despite the failure of the political negotiations.
 The main religion in Moldova is Orthodox Christianity.
 With a population of 3.7 million, Izmir is the third largest city in Turkey, the second largest port after Istanbul, and an excellent hub.
 Today, it is a modern, developed, and lively city, situated around a huge Bay, surrounded by mountains.
 The wide boulevards, the modern glass buildings,
 The village of Haldarsvik offers views of the neighboring island of Eysturoy and houses an unusual octagonal church.
 On the tombs,
 It is worth the trouble to walk half an hour through this fascinating village.
 The romantic and fascinating town of Sintra, situated to the North, is easily accessible and has been rendered famous among foreigners by the brilliant account of its splendor given by Lord Byron.
 The bus 403 of Scotturb regularly goes to Sintra, with a stop at Cabo da Roca.
 When you return to the North,
 And remember,
 There are still many women and men alive who have survived their stay here, and many others who have seen their relatives murdered or killed by forced labour, Jews or non-Jews indifferently.
 Please treat the site with all the dignity, solemnity, and respect it deserves.
 Do not deface the site by marking or scratching graffiti on the structures.
 About half of the people prefer to speak Catalan,
 However, most of the signs are only in Catalan,
 Yet, Spanish is also widely used in public transport and other installations.
 The regular announcements in the Metro are only made in Catalan, but the unplanned disruptions are announced by an automated system in many languages, including Spanish, English, French, Arabic, and Japanese.
 Parisians have the reputation of being egocentric, rude, and arrogant.
 The best way to get along in Paris,
 The Parisians exterior abrupts evaporate rapidly if you make a minimum of courtesy.
 The park is densely wooded,
 The country possesses a great variety of vegetable communities,
 The region is also home to a very great variety of animal and bird species.
 And such as the bear, the Wolf, the Eagle, the Owl, the Lynx, the wild cat, and the great Tetra,
 When they visit a monastery,
 Most monasteries provide stoles to women who arrive without anything, but if you bring your own, and it's a bright color, you'll get a smile from the monk or nun at the entrance.
 So men must wear pants that cover their knees.
 One can also borrow this garment from the stock at the entrance, but as it is not washed after each use, it may be that you do not feel at ease wearing these skirts.
 Like the cuisine of the Mediterranean,
 A simple and popular dish, especially in the summer, is Pa amb Oli,
 All names, followed by the word Sie, which means you, always begin with a capital letter, even in the middle of a sentence.
 It's a great way to make a distinction between certain verbs and objects.
 On the other hand,
 The pronunciation is relatively easy in Italian,
 The main letters to watch out for are C and G, because their pronunciation varies depending on the next vowel.
 Please also make sure to pronounce the R and the RR in a distinct manner: Caro means dear, while Carro means chariot.
 The Persian has a relatively easy and most of the time regular grammar.
 And consequently,
 It goes without saying that if you know a Romance language,
 However, those who speak a little Spanish might hastily conclude that Portuguese is sufficiently close to it for it not to be necessary to study it separately.
 Pre-Modern observatories are generally obsolete today,
 As the light pollution at their time was not as preoccupying as it is today, they are generally situated in cities or on campuses, which are easier to access than those built at the modern time.
 Most of the modern research telescopes are huge infrastructures placed in remote regions where the atmospheric conditions are favorable.
 The contemplation of cherry blossoms, known as Hanami, has been part of Japanese culture since the eighth century.
 The concept came from China where the plum blossom was the flower of choice.
 In Japan, the first Cherry blossom festivals were organised by the Emperor solely for himself and the other members of the Imperial aristocracy.
 When they are in their natural environment,
 If you visit a strictly manicured garden, the taking of specimens will also get you thrown out without discussion.
 Singapore is generally considered as a very safe place, where it is very easy to move about, and where you can buy almost anything you want once you are there.
 But situated in the «tropics elevated» at only a few degrees north of the equator, you will have to adapt to the heat (always) and to a strong radiation of the sun (when the sky is clear, which is more rare).
 There are also a few buses that go North to Hebron, the traditional burial place of the Biblical patriarchs, Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob,
 Check that the bus you are planning to take goes to Hebron and not just to the nearby Jewish settlement of Kiryat Arba.
 Inland waterways can be a great theme for a vacation.
 For example, visiting chateaux in the Loire Valley, the Rhine Valley, or taking a cruise to interesting sites on the Danube or the Erie Canal.
 They also define the routes for hiking trails and popular bike paths.
 Christmas is one of the most important holidays of the Christian religion.
 Many traditions related to these holidays have also been adopted by Non-Believers in Christian countries and by Non-Christians worldwide.
 It is a tradition to spend the night of Easter eve awake in a place that is open to the sky,
 There are, of course, Christian theological explanations for this tradition, but it may well be a pre-Christian spring and fertility rite.
 The more traditional churches often hold a Paschal Vigil on Saturday night during the Easter weekend, with the congregations often bursting into the feast at the stroke of midnight to celebrate the resurrection of Christ.
 All the animals that have come to these Islands,
 Because of the great distance which separates them from the continent,
 Since the arrival of man in the Galapagos,
 If you visit the Arctic or Antarctic regions in winter, you may discover the polar night, during which the sun does not rise above the horizon.
 It's a good time to admire the northern lights, because the sky will be dark practically all day.
 As the regions are sparsely populated,
 The Japanese work culture is more hierarchical and formal than what Westerners may be used to.
 The costumes are classic work uniforms, and the employees are referred to by their last names or by their job titles.
 Harmony at work is crucial,
 The workers must often obtain the consent of their superiors for any decision they make, and are supposed to obey the instructions of their superiors without question.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.26563359657872754, 'precisions': [0.6760325167766926, 0.4362187445862447, 0.30714504753143207, 0.22178632143324178], 'brevity_penalty': 0.7055786912692567, 'length_ratio': 0.7414344079932041, 'translation_length': 18329, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 49.58938474885076, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2} results comet:{'mean_score': 0.7544437429238214, 'scores': [0.7924781441688538, 0.3086538016796112, 0.901491641998291, 0.8152995705604553, 0.400517076253891, 0.7300480008125305, 0.9126363396644592, 0.8259477019309998, 0.9081145524978638, 0.6200968623161316, 0.8835605382919312, 0.8474629521369934, 0.47379711270332336, 0.9044223427772522, 0.8958129286766052, 0.8191364407539368, 0.9059872031211853, 0.4333464801311493, 0.8928558826446533, 0.8505054712295532, 0.9508944153785706, 0.877946674823761, 0.8193717002868652, 0.8934629559516907, 0.2841634452342987, 0.9363910555839539, 0.8841919302940369, 0.8988552689552307, 0.7216125726699829, 0.9006718993186951, 0.5029309391975403, 0.7057019472122192, 0.6654201745986938, 0.9080868363380432, 0.9590299725532532, 0.8849174380302429, 0.7721795439720154, 0.8858243823051453, 0.38532236218452454, 0.8824965357780457, 0.8259193301200867, 0.929876446723938, 0.8902456760406494, 0.9220258593559265, 0.5584864020347595, 0.5439227223396301, 0.8709055781364441, 0.8918649554252625, 0.8721691966056824, 0.4146205484867096, 0.9268538355827332, 0.9015454649925232, 0.9197314381599426, 0.9117226004600525, 0.916285514831543, 0.8861063718795776, 0.8739667534828186, 0.8808521628379822, 0.4635769724845886, 0.417815238237381, 0.8542330861091614, 0.9234485626220703, 0.8742086291313171, 0.9152757525444031, 0.8239256739616394, 0.829978883266449, 0.8234528303146362, 0.6185502409934998, 0.464542031288147, 0.8671644330024719, 0.8504878878593445, 0.8754335641860962, 0.876300036907196, 0.6082144379615784, 0.4046298563480377, 0.4689922332763672, 0.8885409235954285, 0.39339888095855713, 0.6262186765670776, 0.39655545353889465, 0.6120565533638, 0.6821281313896179, 0.8902533650398254, 0.7883052229881287, 0.8817517757415771, 0.8761695623397827, 0.32725587487220764, 0.8949153423309326, 0.9239850044250488, 0.8843432068824768, 0.7589716911315918, 0.8758654594421387, 0.415209025144577, 0.9545730948448181, 0.8993690609931946, 0.6372571587562561, 0.851315975189209, 0.8109214901924133, 0.459590345621109, 0.8315760493278503, 0.4041441082954407, 0.8662782311439514, 0.8866517543792725, 0.9535930752754211, 0.7835443019866943, 0.6999262571334839, 0.837139368057251, 0.8776589632034302, 0.34546366333961487, 0.7245959043502808, 0.9225310683250427, 0.9093163013458252, 0.9233473539352417, 0.9260469675064087, 0.8917514085769653, 0.8710802793502808, 0.896308958530426, 0.8497942090034485, 0.954612135887146, 0.8030909299850464, 0.4689057171344757, 0.48144227266311646, 0.5110868215560913, 0.9216338992118835, 0.9248901605606079, 0.6039751172065735, 0.8441998362541199, 0.8881147503852844, 0.8924108147621155, 0.8964548110961914, 0.8442383408546448, 0.8873465061187744, 0.43922969698905945, 0.9235699772834778, 0.8374084830284119, 0.5424264669418335, 0.8820250034332275, 0.9008506536483765, 0.9348090291023254, 0.4912213981151581, 0.6816092133522034, 0.8889859914779663, 0.8818089365959167, 0.869350016117096, 0.6171591877937317, 0.898751974105835, 0.8804104328155518, 0.9162224531173706, 0.8339223265647888, 0.893003523349762, 0.48869290947914124, 0.6314027905464172, 0.8246174454689026, 0.8025309443473816, 0.6516453623771667, 0.6557491421699524, 0.854317307472229, 0.7438894510269165, 0.7890042662620544, 0.48465824127197266, 0.6049792766571045, 0.44006651639938354, 0.6297391057014465, 0.43136101961135864, 0.902398407459259, 0.8460304141044617, 0.6832639575004578, 0.8747684955596924, 0.8473851084709167, 0.5087661743164062, 0.8116515278816223, 0.7560847401618958, 0.9097992777824402, 0.6475757956504822, 0.8358729481697083, 0.8557096719741821, 0.5667900443077087, 0.8706279397010803, 0.931939423084259, 0.5989449620246887, 0.8962598443031311, 0.9192923903465271, 0.9011794328689575, 0.5534610152244568, 0.8876979947090149, 0.9171887636184692, 0.768433690071106, 0.5466811060905457, 0.648642897605896, 0.6516591906547546, 0.3707168698310852, 0.6130668520927429, 0.8584403395652771, 0.28025540709495544, 0.8381587862968445, 0.9131074547767639, 0.4720645248889923, 0.80884850025177, 0.4619894325733185, 0.9041688442230225, 0.885313868522644, 0.7717422842979431, 0.7711241841316223, 0.7400510311126709, 0.8844161629676819, 0.8712220191955566, 0.5277776718139648, 0.8797615170478821, 0.9117331504821777, 0.9394083023071289, 0.5331593751907349, 0.8922261595726013, 0.8649133443832397, 0.9458478689193726, 0.8944382071495056, 0.9245336651802063, 0.8645356297492981, 0.8375537395477295, 0.8990599513053894, 0.8314741849899292, 0.8778916001319885, 0.8917473554611206, 0.9321179389953613, 0.8881741166114807, 0.882388174533844, 0.9364431500434875, 0.8604109883308411, 0.6534189581871033, 0.8591331839561462, 0.7290582060813904, 0.8736673593521118, 0.8807055354118347, 0.8402966856956482, 0.9182071685791016, 0.5363108515739441, 0.4714576303958893, 0.8785152435302734, 0.8948943018913269, 0.9521369338035583, 0.8178184032440186, 0.8006622195243835, 0.7171745896339417, 0.7205305695533752, 0.4103148579597473, 0.5099559426307678, 0.8968189358711243, 0.8163114786148071, 0.5082532167434692, 0.5096476674079895, 0.9174504280090332, 0.7926000952720642, 0.8228639364242554, 0.9239951372146606, 0.9229300618171692, 0.9291790723800659, 0.7313693761825562, 0.8828054070472717, 0.873150646686554, 0.8764076828956604, 0.8639428615570068, 0.46891555190086365, 0.8144742846488953, 0.5377994179725647, 0.578038215637207, 0.4267787039279938, 0.769398033618927, 0.9239380955696106, 0.7967556118965149, 0.9283736348152161, 0.6330934166908264, 0.8795700073242188, 0.43803080916404724, 0.8455259203910828, 0.8679782152175903, 0.7877427935600281, 0.36377716064453125, 0.41022032499313354, 0.945283830165863, 0.5228490233421326, 0.9391656517982483, 0.3955047130584717, 0.7810022234916687, 0.8968897461891174, 0.8528831601142883, 0.9261230826377869, 0.9334008097648621, 0.8140725493431091, 0.5589417815208435, 0.9296193718910217, 0.8092982172966003, 0.8583053946495056, 0.8664807081222534, 0.8872799277305603, 0.8737134337425232, 0.7859883904457092, 0.8819774985313416, 0.4200578033924103, 0.8528830409049988, 0.7444470524787903, 0.8554065227508545, 0.9133197665214539, 0.8589256405830383, 0.8542295098304749, 0.5304413437843323, 0.8285999894142151, 0.5616653561592102, 0.7942312359809875, 0.7933661341667175, 0.8925336003303528, 0.8832815289497375, 0.8985747694969177, 0.8909609913825989, 0.8730238676071167, 0.7179316878318787, 0.8624758124351501, 0.6417781710624695, 0.589776337146759, 0.48848846554756165, 0.7105154395103455, 0.9077958464622498, 0.36081528663635254, 0.36008650064468384, 0.8633665442466736, 0.8662591576576233, 0.9056769609451294, 0.4086378514766693, 0.8512471914291382, 0.7292789816856384, 0.9122444987297058, 0.9335829019546509, 0.8336681723594666, 0.6814148426055908, 0.9523002505302429, 0.5332370400428772, 0.8970649838447571, 0.9066800475120544, 0.8944123387336731, 0.8151854276657104, 0.8788964748382568, 0.8482202887535095, 0.8372505903244019, 0.5592595338821411, 0.7276724576950073, 0.6583436131477356, 0.7996135354042053, 0.839526355266571, 0.902800977230072, 0.8293758034706116, 0.4103679358959198, 0.8801162838935852, 0.8715758323669434, 0.9097877144813538, 0.4784252345561981, 0.7661864161491394, 0.6739311814308167, 0.927279531955719, 0.9017043113708496, 0.5009112358093262, 0.9491142630577087, 0.4816528856754303, 0.5017023086547852, 0.8790151476860046, 0.5163635611534119, 0.6351987719535828, 0.6272723078727722, 0.6376174688339233, 0.4570300281047821, 0.7734708189964294, 0.49143925309181213, 0.7644919753074646, 0.7609074115753174, 0.7133117914199829, 0.40764185786247253, 0.8999553918838501, 0.7548425793647766, 0.758608877658844, 0.47133341431617737, 0.8091213703155518, 0.8543550372123718, 0.7802850008010864, 0.7136484980583191, 0.6406977772712708, 0.46079373359680176, 0.5271965265274048, 0.8213710188865662, 0.46743425726890564, 0.2987493574619293, 0.8567858338356018, 0.4908590018749237, 0.8571321964263916, 0.7032865285873413, 0.5588617920875549, 0.8728484511375427, 0.930806040763855, 0.5462267994880676, 0.8261860013008118, 0.384447306394577, 0.8166278004646301, 0.37116992473602295, 0.5185922980308533, 0.57163006067276, 0.615317165851593, 0.6099310517311096, 0.6272388100624084, 0.3059418499469757, 0.8900039196014404, 0.39230725169181824, 0.3961121439933777, 0.8560157418251038, 0.905832827091217, 0.9142857193946838, 0.8247300982475281, 0.8979128003120422, 0.924325168132782, 0.7846693396568298, 0.5663728713989258, 0.722123920917511, 0.9153833985328674, 0.8563427329063416, 0.9238914251327515, 0.9289886355400085, 0.7068890333175659, 0.49153444170951843, 0.5269339680671692, 0.8904014229774475, 0.913844645023346, 0.6241521239280701, 0.9021843075752258, 0.9126613140106201, 0.9510706067085266, 0.4100070893764496, 0.7687427401542664, 0.5755599141120911, 0.5485303997993469, 0.6417574286460876, 0.7491403222084045, 0.8643686771392822, 0.8467166423797607, 0.4484730660915375, 0.7158835530281067, 0.9223254919052124, 0.7231600880622864, 0.9393057227134705, 0.9418985247612, 0.8658154606819153, 0.5865539908409119, 0.8570194840431213, 0.9171600937843323, 0.9151924252510071, 0.7260858416557312, 0.7477918863296509, 0.8804667592048645, 0.9331899285316467, 0.7272624373435974, 0.8810165524482727, 0.8334724307060242, 0.523392379283905, 0.9177160263061523, 0.5481885075569153, 0.885522723197937, 0.6905953288078308, 0.4901476800441742, 0.2955210208892822, 0.7314043641090393, 0.8356350064277649, 0.557344377040863, 0.9090638756752014, 0.42250195145606995, 0.6430355906486511, 0.41385912895202637, 0.7624382376670837, 0.6299529075622559, 0.8634756803512573, 0.4608529508113861, 0.8155274391174316, 0.8881717324256897, 0.8892243504524231, 0.8873204588890076, 0.6355181932449341, 0.7831258177757263, 0.8987141847610474, 0.8678393959999084, 0.41256746649742126, 0.9256278872489929, 0.920725405216217, 0.86907958984375, 0.8933524489402771, 0.7596875429153442, 0.6526302695274353, 0.8925339579582214, 0.3181731700897217, 0.9054540991783142, 0.9188651442527771, 0.8639469146728516, 0.8315518498420715, 0.8729353547096252, 0.8744135499000549, 0.8965951204299927, 0.7647525668144226, 0.9184281229972839, 0.9021496772766113, 0.9462077617645264, 0.9221938252449036, 0.901282548904419, 0.47439152002334595, 0.9191101789474487, 0.5920848250389099, 0.4453253746032715, 0.8468202352523804, 0.8238651156425476, 0.587677538394928, 0.7925745248794556, 0.6624780297279358, 0.8970378041267395, 0.8601019978523254, 0.9231439232826233, 0.8745308518409729, 0.8533227443695068, 0.916962206363678, 0.8019208312034607, 0.8311849236488342, 0.7583290934562683, 0.8514197468757629, 0.3760039806365967, 0.933766782283783, 0.8311611413955688, 0.7080901265144348, 0.749594509601593, 0.8974184393882751, 0.6545170545578003, 0.863804280757904, 0.4524696171283722, 0.8487930297851562, 0.8067813515663147, 0.7013021111488342, 0.9167134761810303, 0.6440439224243164, 0.8034554123878479, 0.41178596019744873, 0.6287833452224731, 0.6757331490516663, 0.7795037031173706, 0.8858413696289062, 0.6233153343200684, 0.37527593970298767, 0.9277594685554504, 0.4337717294692993, 0.34053900837898254, 0.3204982578754425, 0.9298445582389832, 0.8749647736549377, 0.8301711678504944, 0.5068207383155823, 0.5625589489936829, 0.9249925017356873, 0.8812872171401978, 0.7848491072654724, 0.9318629503250122, 0.8247055411338806, 0.7994218468666077, 0.9168747663497925, 0.902990996837616, 0.5150118470191956, 0.5862533450126648, 0.8209046721458435, 0.8794261813163757, 0.5467454195022583, 0.8875989317893982, 0.4956338703632355, 0.7751079201698303, 0.8749566078186035, 0.5915454030036926, 0.655396044254303, 0.7840959429740906, 0.6731122136116028, 0.915867030620575, 0.8826830387115479, 0.8038392663002014, 0.6526336073875427, 0.9333950281143188, 0.9173042178153992, 0.8608947396278381, 0.9213799238204956, 0.9235097765922546, 0.3019615709781647, 0.8873516321182251, 0.6484286189079285, 0.8889649510383606, 0.6594054102897644, 0.9462494254112244, 0.42808541655540466, 0.8312013745307922, 0.3733013868331909, 0.7516540288925171, 0.8787779211997986, 0.5812700986862183, 0.9270698428153992, 0.9004096388816833, 0.884789228439331, 0.9236703515052795, 0.9492030739784241, 0.7716460227966309, 0.9068376421928406, 0.8356300592422485, 0.6562209129333496, 0.9349879026412964, 0.6994701027870178, 0.794200599193573, 0.5442255735397339, 0.4798724949359894, 0.7786824107170105, 0.8942374587059021, 0.5918495059013367, 0.8963066339492798, 0.9131014943122864, 0.9188909530639648, 0.846677839756012, 0.9588389992713928, 0.5938062071800232, 0.9083375930786133, 0.8082172274589539, 0.8439085483551025, 0.8920496702194214, 0.5287161469459534, 0.3354528546333313, 0.8293359875679016, 0.7484449744224548, 0.9217443466186523, 0.7198530435562134, 0.9011732935905457, 0.884633481502533, 0.6911785006523132, 0.8539699912071228, 0.9464313387870789, 0.9501181840896606, 0.9072778224945068, 0.6556763052940369, 0.5019963383674622, 0.7764054536819458, 0.2984502911567688, 0.8931841254234314, 0.8006235957145691, 0.2845364511013031, 0.9284346699714661, 0.8367885947227478, 0.8669797778129578, 0.888205349445343, 0.8672588467597961, 0.5468030571937561, 0.6922162771224976, 0.8449039459228516, 0.8585807085037231, 0.6956246495246887, 0.5246387124061584, 0.8434186577796936, 0.938141405582428, 0.8347951769828796, 0.8906105160713196, 0.4790855944156647, 0.6111461520195007, 0.43822234869003296, 0.8734108209609985, 0.9222590327262878, 0.9448792338371277, 0.9492098689079285, 0.9144089818000793, 0.6047649383544922, 0.7772327065467834, 0.78641277551651, 0.8931240439414978, 0.9184472560882568, 0.9166883230209351, 0.9038533568382263, 0.8201258778572083, 0.9458763003349304, 0.29983535408973694, 0.9210441708564758, 0.9378947019577026, 0.906440019607544, 0.8661473989486694, 0.8826290965080261, 0.7022823095321655, 0.8324976563453674, 0.34249237179756165, 0.5990476012229919, 0.865276038646698, 0.7938781380653381, 0.7323752045631409, 0.9029636979103088, 0.3686928451061249, 0.9285081624984741, 0.3041275143623352, 0.9053515195846558, 0.5399267673492432, 0.464823842048645, 0.7514159679412842, 0.5594543814659119, 0.8706353306770325, 0.6278596520423889, 0.9199543595314026, 0.8031824231147766, 0.9070741534233093, 0.4506194591522217, 0.433737188577652, 0.6121211647987366, 0.7990926504135132, 0.7534162998199463, 0.9134017825126648, 0.46788734197616577, 0.91828852891922, 0.938113272190094, 0.6977731585502625, 0.9343230724334717, 0.8980764150619507, 0.9175480604171753, 0.8565930724143982, 0.8717617988586426, 0.5622544884681702, 0.9316146969795227, 0.8277594447135925, 0.5384246706962585, 0.7062302827835083, 0.8564396500587463, 0.8647823929786682, 0.8917039036750793, 0.92862468957901, 0.8548645377159119, 0.5618940591812134, 0.7654644846916199, 0.5748249292373657, 0.8465242385864258, 0.6127380728721619, 0.8763149976730347, 0.7207074761390686, 0.8937190771102905, 0.8862684369087219, 0.8160162568092346, 0.6267725229263306, 0.9256808161735535, 0.8584482073783875, 0.9011041522026062, 0.5817341208457947, 0.6870664954185486, 0.9272486567497253, 0.7408460974693298, 0.9098055362701416, 0.8776074051856995, 0.5786803364753723, 0.943941056728363, 0.9292959570884705, 0.8618445992469788, 0.9377875924110413, 0.30878856778144836, 0.8260087370872498, 0.7961133122444153, 0.786139190196991, 0.294781357049942, 0.6075642704963684, 0.853248119354248, 0.6866030693054199, 0.9275563359260559, 0.6384701132774353, 0.7619947791099548, 0.7307752370834351, 0.3995603024959564, 0.84760981798172, 0.7824526429176331, 0.9168589115142822, 0.7127672433853149, 0.9591012597084045, 0.8933439254760742, 0.5231073498725891, 0.8143508434295654, 0.45329293608665466, 0.9031077027320862, 0.8239241242408752, 0.8815922737121582, 0.7237423062324524, 0.6653736233711243, 0.8894592523574829, 0.8799461722373962, 0.7644102573394775, 0.9225673675537109, 0.8046852946281433, 0.9047959446907043, 0.4878801107406616, 0.7039591670036316, 0.9032222032546997, 0.680986225605011, 0.5752198100090027, 0.9034320712089539, 0.8753472566604614, 0.32423514127731323, 0.4349493086338043, 0.5436639189720154, 0.6385610103607178, 0.9824085831642151, 0.7867686152458191, 0.9036738276481628, 0.8507464528083801, 0.8857759237289429, 0.8345369696617126, 0.9034226536750793, 0.9292692542076111, 0.8086308836936951, 0.8651527762413025, 0.9080997109413147, 0.9322509169578552, 0.6686920523643494, 0.9076774716377258, 0.6482359766960144, 0.5170779824256897, 0.7948184609413147, 0.9263866543769836, 0.8948833346366882, 0.3980512022972107, 0.8685165643692017, 0.33081522583961487, 0.6871206164360046, 0.6886654496192932, 0.7854881286621094, 0.8045998215675354, 0.4869674742221832, 0.852534294128418, 0.9282329678535461, 0.44610515236854553, 0.31952792406082153, 0.6344105005264282, 0.9335211515426636, 0.698563814163208, 0.7915690541267395, 0.44982466101646423, 0.5741568207740784, 0.6029278635978699, 0.9160786271095276, 0.8587983250617981, 0.9101960062980652, 0.7344487309455872, 0.9084489941596985, 0.48072585463523865, 0.8859378099441528, 0.8667346835136414, 0.8825957179069519, 0.8668953776359558, 0.7014296650886536, 0.9017766714096069, 0.3387271761894226, 0.38262662291526794, 0.5432724952697754, 0.8807113170623779, 0.8689799904823303, 0.6488543152809143, 0.7665327191352844, 0.41325849294662476, 0.4876636862754822, 0.918409526348114, 0.533107340335846, 0.8952938914299011, 0.5400625467300415, 0.5179997086524963, 0.4408869445323944, 0.7187337875366211, 0.5842588543891907, 0.8656732439994812, 0.8523010611534119, 0.37322309613227844, 0.6380642056465149, 0.8606413006782532, 0.8519786596298218, 0.865247368812561, 0.4102027714252472, 0.8786506652832031, 0.9275550842285156, 0.8626996874809265, 0.8925766348838806, 0.8721603751182556, 0.9058058857917786, 0.8290997743606567, 0.9505119323730469, 0.5022109746932983, 0.8673170804977417, 0.9016729593276978, 0.9449241757392883, 0.8784878849983215, 0.7579180598258972, 0.9141203761100769, 0.9323210120201111, 0.8790716528892517, 0.7008689641952515, 0.536224901676178, 0.6040961742401123, 0.5707660913467407, 0.3611195683479309, 0.6863383054733276, 0.9001858830451965, 0.9200292825698853, 0.5379466414451599, 0.9181262254714966, 0.8214125633239746, 0.7677903771400452, 0.3247973620891571, 0.9192579388618469, 0.7892598509788513, 0.8877443075180054, 0.7324201464653015, 0.8843146562576294, 0.853107750415802, 0.8670918941497803, 0.8616473078727722, 0.43708691000938416, 0.6946187019348145, 0.5441611409187317, 0.9107916951179504, 0.5133571028709412, 0.8853100538253784, 0.81133633852005, 0.8967682719230652, 0.890280544757843, 0.8610156774520874, 0.9060177206993103, 0.5700429081916809, 0.4124874770641327, 0.9057638049125671, 0.5643860101699829, 0.8938503861427307, 0.34831172227859497, 0.8225370049476624, 0.8057026863098145, 0.9283285737037659, 0.36146676540374756, 0.3985542058944702, 0.5773008465766907, 0.7170791625976562, 0.7765448093414307, 0.8419755697250366, 0.8533177375793457, 0.8746713995933533, 0.684981644153595, 0.9161547422409058, 0.8774834275245667, 0.9389083981513977, 0.9646397829055786, 0.9163164496421814, 0.8459358811378479, 0.5355431437492371, 0.9146490693092346, 0.39918848872184753, 0.8884857296943665, 0.8681055903434753, 0.9087442755699158, 0.3720691502094269, 0.38098224997520447, 0.8526703119277954, 0.8154009580612183, 0.9228132367134094, 0.7042967081069946, 0.7161009311676025, 0.9312180876731873, 0.9087197184562683, 0.9635454416275024, 0.42337411642074585, 0.7844796776771545, 0.5434507727622986, 0.5316120982170105, 0.9505593180656433, 0.5996144413948059, 0.3678186237812042, 0.810137927532196, 0.8269190192222595, 0.7828740477561951, 0.4656917154788971, 0.660601794719696, 0.8103919625282288, 0.9037169218063354, 0.33044442534446716, 0.680445671081543, 0.8982222676277161, 0.823062002658844, 0.9269141554832458, 0.3168224096298218, 0.5851975679397583, 0.8756479620933533, 0.7433694005012512, 0.8744083046913147, 0.9251212477684021, 0.893873393535614, 0.9486650228500366, 0.8902241587638855, 0.4411535859107971, 0.7568455934524536, 0.891243040561676, 0.8238186240196228, 0.8720195889472961, 0.9216828346252441, 0.9131893515586853, 0.8926141858100891, 0.9446168541908264, 0.8798214793205261, 0.8926645517349243, 0.7719072699546814, 0.9228047728538513, 0.8734908699989319, 0.5371269583702087, 0.43084844946861267, 0.480234295129776, 0.9041140675544739, 0.7440633177757263, 0.5545867085456848, 0.9487467408180237, 0.8740851879119873, 0.6184074878692627, 0.893643319606781]}